Texas, session 892, HB16.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: ARTICLE 1.  DISTRICT COURTS, DISTRICT CLERKS, AND DISTRICT ATTORNEYS SECTION 1.01.  Effective January 1, 2027, the heading to Section 24.127, Government Code, is amended to read as follows: Sec. 24.127.  522ND [SECOND 25TH] JUDICIAL DISTRICT ([COLORADO,] GONZALES AND[,] GUADALUPE[, AND LAVACA] COUNTIES). SECTION 1.02.  Effective January 1, 2027, Section 24.127(a), Government Code, is amended to read as follows: (a)  The 522nd [Second 25th] Judicial District is composed of [Colorado,] Gonzales and[,] Guadalupe[, and Lavaca] counties. SECTION 1.03.  Section 24.144, Government Code, is amended by adding Subsection (b-1) to read as follows: (b-1)  In Callahan County, the 42nd District Court and the county court have concurrent jurisdiction over all original and appellate criminal matters over which the county court has jurisdiction. Matters and proceedings in the concurrent jurisdiction of the courts may be filed in or transferred between the 42nd District Court and the county court. All writs and processes issued and bonds and recognizances made in transferred cases are returnable to the court to which the case is transferred as if originally issued in that court. SECTION 1.04.  Section 24.360, Government Code, is amended to read as follows: Sec. 24.360.  173RD JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HENDERSON COUNTY). (a) The 173rd Judicial District is composed of Henderson County. (b)  The 173rd District Court shall give preference to civil and family law matters. SECTION 1.05.  Effective January 1, 2026, the heading to Section 24.451, Government Code, is amended to read as follows: Sec. 24.451.  274TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (COMAL[, GUADALUPE,] AND HAYS COUNTIES). SECTION 1.06.  Effective January 1, 2026, Sections 24.451(a) and (c), Government Code, are amended to read as follows: (a)  The 274th Judicial District is composed of Comal[, Guadalupe,] and Hays counties. (c)  The 274th District Court has the same jurisdiction as the 22nd and the 207th district courts in Comal and Hays counties [and concurrent jurisdiction with the 25th and Second 25th district courts in Guadalupe County]. SECTION 1.07.  Section 24.537, Government Code, is amended by adding Subsection (c) to read as follows: (c)  The 392nd District Court shall give preference to criminal cases. SECTION 1.08.  Section 24.591(c), Government Code, is amended to read as follows: (c)  The district clerk serves as clerk of a district court in all criminal and civil matters, including family matters, except the county clerk serves as clerk of a district court in Class A and Class B misdemeanor cases, juvenile matters, probate matters, and guardianship matters. Each clerk shall establish a separate docket for a district court [All civil and criminal matters within the concurrent jurisdiction of the county and district courts must be filed with the county clerk in the county court.  The county clerk serves as the clerk of the district court for those matters]. SECTION 1.09.  (a)  Effective September 1, 2026, Subchapter C, Chapter 24, Government Code, is amended by adding Section 24.60035 to read as follows: Sec. 24.60035.  490TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (BRAZORIA COUNTY). The 490th Judicial District is composed of Brazoria County. (b)  The 490th Judicial District is created on September 1, 2026. SECTION 1.10.  (a) Effective September 1, 2026, Subchapter C, Chapter 24, Government Code, is amended by adding Section 24.60037 to read as follows: Sec. 24.60037.  492ND JUDICIAL DISTRICT (COLORADO AND LAVACA COUNTIES). The 492nd Judicial District is composed of Colorado and Lavaca counties. (b)  The 492nd Judicial District is created on September 1, 2026. SECTION 1.11.  Effective January 1, 2026, Section 24.60043(d), Government Code, is amended to read as follows: (d)  The district clerk serves as the clerk of a district court in all criminal and civil matters, including family matters, except the county clerk serves as the clerk of a district court in Class A and Class B misdemeanor cases, juvenile matters, probate matters, and guardianship matters. Each clerk shall establish a separate docket for a district court [All civil and criminal matters within the concurrent jurisdiction of the county and district courts must be filed with the county clerk in the county court.  The county clerk serves as the clerk of the district court for those matters]. SECTION 1.12.  (a) Subchapter C, Chapter 24, Government Code, is amended by adding Sections 24.60046 and 24.60047 to read as follows: Sec. 24.60046.  501ST JUDICIAL DISTRICT (FORT BEND COUNTY). (a) The 501st Judicial District is composed of Fort Bend County. (b)  The 501st District Court shall give preference to family law matters. Sec. 24.60047.  502ND JUDICIAL DISTRICT (FORT BEND COUNTY). The 502nd Judicial District is composed of Fort Bend County. (b)  The 501st and 502nd Judicial Districts are created on the effective date of this section. (c)  This section takes effect December 1, 2025, if this Act receives a vote of two-thirds of all the members elected to each house, as provided by Section 39, Article III, Texas Constitution. If this Act does not receive a vote of at least two-thirds of all the members elected to each house, this section takes effect: (1)  December 1, 2025, if December 1, 2025, is on or after the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session; or (2)  the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session, if December 1, 2025, is before the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session. SECTION 1.13.  (a)  Subchapter C, Chapter 24, Government Code, is amended by adding Section 24.60048 to read as follows: Sec. 24.60048.  503RD JUDICIAL DISTRICT (ROCKWALL COUNTY). The 503rd Judicial District is composed of Rockwall County. (b)  The 503rd Judicial District is created on the effective date of this section. (c)  This section takes effect December 1, 2025, if this Act receives a vote of two-thirds of all the members elected to each house, as provided by Section 39, Article III, Texas Constitution. If this Act does not receive a vote of at least two-thirds of all the members elected to each house, this section takes effect: (1)  December 1, 2025, if December 1, 2025, is on or after the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session; or (2)  the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session, if December 1, 2025, is before the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session. SECTION 1.14.  (a)  Subchapter C, Chapter 24, Government Code, is amended by adding Section 24.60049 to read as follows: Sec. 24.60049.  504TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (ELLIS COUNTY).  The 504th Judicial District is composed of Ellis County. (b)  The 504th Judicial District is created on the effective date of this section. (c)  This section takes effect December 1, 2025, if this Act receives a vote of two-thirds of all the members elected to each house, as provided by Section 39, Article III, Texas Constitution. If this Act does not receive a vote of at least two-thirds of all the members elected to each house, this section takes effect: (1)  December 1, 2025, if December 1, 2025, is on or after the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session; or (2)  the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session, if December 1, 2025, is before the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session. SECTION 1.15.  (a)  Effective September 1, 2026, Subchapter C, Chapter 24, Government Code, is amended by adding Section 24.60053 to read as follows: Sec. 24.60053.  511TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (COMAL COUNTY). The 511th Judicial District is composed of Comal County. (b)  The 511th Judicial District is created on September 1, 2026. SECTION 1.16.  (a)  Subchapter C, Chapter 24, Government Code, is amended by adding Section 24.60054 to read as follows: Sec. 24.60054.  512TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (WILLIAMSON COUNTY).  The 512th Judicial District is composed of Williamson County. (b)  The 512th Judicial District is created on the effective date of this section. (c)  This section takes effect December 1, 2025, if this Act receives a vote of two-thirds of all the members elected to each house, as provided by Section 39, Article III, Texas Constitution. If this Act does not receive a vote of at least two-thirds of all the members elected to each house, this section takes effect: (1)  December 1, 2025, if December 1, 2025, is on or after the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session; or (2)  the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session, if December 1, 2025, is before the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session. SECTION 1.17.  (a)  Effective September 1, 2026, Subchapter C, Chapter 24, Government Code, is amended by adding Sections 24.60055, 24.60056, and 24.60057 to read as follows: Sec. 24.60055.  513TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). (a) The 513th Judicial District is composed of Harris County. (b)  The 513th District Court shall give preference to civil cases. Sec. 24.60056.  514TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). (a) The 514th Judicial District is composed of Harris County. (b)  The 514th District Court shall give preference to civil cases. Sec. 24.60057.  515TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). (a) The 515th Judicial District is composed of Harris County. (b)  The 515th District Court shall give preference to civil cases. (b)  The 513th, 514th, and 515th Judicial Districts are created on September 1, 2026. SECTION 1.18.  (a)  Effective October 1, 2026, Subchapter C, Chapter 24, Government Code, is amended by adding Sections 24.60058 and 24.60059 to read as follows: Sec. 24.60058.  516TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). (a) The 516th Judicial District is composed of Harris County. (b)  The 516th District Court shall give preference to civil cases. Sec. 24.60059.  517TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). (a) The 517th Judicial District is composed of Harris County. (b)  The 517th District Court shall give preference to civil cases. (b)  The 516th and 517th Judicial Districts are created on October 1, 2026. SECTION 1.19.  (a) Effective September 1, 2026, Subchapter C, Chapter 24, Government Code, is amended by adding Section 24.60064 to read as follows: Sec. 24.60064.  523RD JUDICIAL DISTRICT (MONTGOMERY COUNTY). (a) The 523rd Judicial District is composed of Montgomery County. (b)  The 523rd District Court shall give preference to criminal cases. (b)  The 523rd Judicial District is created on September 1, 2026. SECTION 1.20.  Section 24.911, Government Code, is amended by adding Subsection (a-2) to read as follows: (a-2)  Tarrant County Criminal District Court No. 2 shall give preference to criminal cases. SECTION 1.21.  Section 24.913, Government Code, is amended by adding Subsection (e) to read as follows: (e)  Tarrant County Criminal District Court No. 4 shall give preference to criminal cases. SECTION 1.22.  Effective September 1, 2028, Section 43.101, Government Code, is amended to read as follows: Sec. 43.101.  1ST JUDICIAL DISTRICT. The voters of [Sabine and] San Augustine County [counties] elect a district attorney for the 1st Judicial District who represents the state in the [that] district courts in that county [court only in those counties]. SECTION 1.23.  (a)  Effective January 1, 2029, Subchapter B, Chapter 43, Government Code, is amended by adding Section 43.1742 to read as follows: Sec. 43.1742.  273RD JUDICIAL DISTRICT. The voters of Sabine County elect a district attorney for the 273rd Judicial District who represents the state in the district courts in that county. (b)  The office of district attorney for the 273rd Judicial District is created on September 1, 2028. SECTION 1.24.  Effective January 1, 2029, Section 43.177, Government Code, is amended to read as follows: Sec. 43.177.  293RD JUDICIAL DISTRICT. (a) The voters of Maverick County [the 293rd Judicial District] elect a district attorney who represents the state in all cases before the [that] district court. (b)  The commissioners court of Maverick County [one or more of the counties comprising the district] may supplement the state salary of the district attorney and[.  The commissioners court of each county may] set the amount of supplemental compensation paid by that county. (c)  The district attorney of the 293rd Judicial District also represents the state in all criminal and civil matters that arise in the 365th Judicial District in Maverick County. SECTION 1.25.  (a)  Effective January 1, 2029, Subchapter B, Chapter 43, Government Code, is amended by adding Section 43.1812 to read as follows: Sec. 43.1812.  365TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT.  The voters of Dimmit and Zavala Counties elect a district attorney for the 365th Judicial District who represents the state in all civil and criminal matters in the district courts having jurisdiction in those counties. (b)  The office of district attorney for the 365th Judicial District is created on January 1, 2029. (c)  The office of district attorney for the 365th Judicial District exists for purposes of the primary and general elections in 2028. SECTION 1.26.  Effective January 1, 2029, Section 46.002, Government Code, is amended to read as follows: Sec. 46.002.  PROSECUTORS SUBJECT TO CHAPTER.  This chapter applies to the state prosecuting attorney, all county prosecutors, and the following state prosecutors: (1)  the district attorneys for Kenedy and Kleberg Counties and for the 1st, 2nd, 8th, 9th, 18th, 21st, 23rd, 24th, 26th, 27th, 29th, 31st, 32nd, 33rd, 34th, 35th, 36th, 38th, 39th, 42nd, 43rd, 46th, 47th, 49th, 50th, 51st, 52nd, 53rd, 63rd, 64th, 66th, 69th, 70th, 76th, 79th, 81st, 83rd, 84th, 85th, 88th, 90th, 97th, 100th, 105th, 106th, 109th, 110th, 112th, 118th, 119th, 123rd, 132nd, 142nd, 143rd, 145th, 156th, 159th, 173rd, 196th, 198th, 216th, 220th, 229th, 235th, 253rd, 258th, 259th, 266th, 268th, 271st, 273rd, 286th, 287th, 329th, 344th, 349th, 355th, 369th, 452nd, and 506th judicial districts; (2)  the criminal district attorneys for the counties of Anderson, Austin, Bastrop, Bexar, Bowie, Brazoria, Caldwell, Calhoun, Cass, Collin, Comal, Dallas, Deaf Smith, Denton, Eastland, Fannin, Galveston, Grayson, Gregg, Harrison, Hays, Hidalgo, Jasper, Jefferson, Kaufman, Kendall, Lubbock, McLennan, Madison, Medina, Navarro, Newton, Panola, Polk, Randall, Rockwall, San Jacinto, Smith, Tarrant, Taylor, Tyler, Upshur, Van Zandt, Victoria, Walker, Waller, Wichita, Wood, and Yoakum; and (3)  the county attorneys performing the duties of district attorneys in the counties of Andrews, Aransas, Burleson, Callahan, Cameron, Castro, Colorado, Crosby, Ellis, Falls, Fayette, Freestone, Gonzales, Guadalupe, Lamar, Lamb, Lampasas, Lavaca, Lee, Limestone, Marion, Milam, Morris, Ochiltree, Oldham, Orange, Rains, Red River, Robertson, Rusk, Swisher, Terry, Webb, and Willacy. SECTION 1.27.  (a)  Section 24.600(b), Government Code, is repealed. (b)  Effective January 1, 2026, the following provisions of the Government Code are repealed: (1)  Sections 24.126(b) and (d); (2)  Sections 24.127(b) and (c); and (3)  Section 24.451(b). ARTICLE 2.  STATUTORY COUNTY COURTS SECTION 2.01.  Sections 22.004(b) and (h-1), Government Code, are amended to read as follows: (b)  The supreme court from time to time may promulgate a specific rule or rules of civil procedure, or an amendment or amendments to a specific rule or rules, to be effective at the time the supreme court deems expedient in the interest of a proper administration of justice.  The rules and amendments to rules remain in effect unless and until disapproved by the legislature.  The clerk of the supreme court shall file with the secretary of state the rules or amendments to rules promulgated by the supreme court under this subsection and shall provide [mail] a copy of those rules or amendments to rules to each registered member of the State Bar of Texas not later than the 60th day before the date on which they become effective.  On receiving a written request from a member of the legislature, the secretary of state shall provide the member with electronic notifications when the supreme court has promulgated rules or amendments to rules under this section. (h-1)  In addition to the rules adopted under Subsection (h), the supreme court shall adopt rules to promote the prompt, efficient, and cost-effective resolution of civil actions filed in county courts at law in which the amount in controversy does not exceed $325,000 [$250,000]. The rules shall balance the need for lowering discovery costs in these actions against the complexity of and discovery needs in these actions. The supreme court may not adopt rules under this subsection that conflict with other statutory law. SECTION 2.02.  Section 25.0003(c), Government Code, is amended to read as follows: (c)  In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, a statutory county court exercising civil jurisdiction concurrent with the constitutional jurisdiction of the county court has concurrent jurisdiction with the district court in: (1)  civil cases in which the matter in controversy exceeds $500 but does not exceed $325,000 [$250,000], excluding interest, statutory or punitive damages and penalties, and attorney's fees and costs, as alleged on the face of the petition; and (2)  appeals of final rulings and decisions of the division of workers' compensation of the Texas Department of Insurance regarding workers' compensation claims, regardless of the amount in controversy. SECTION 2.03.  Section 25.0005(a), Government Code, is amended to read as follows: (a)  A statutory county court judge, other than a statutory county court judge who engages in the private practice of law, shall be paid a total annual salary set by the commissioners court at an amount that is not less than $1,000 less than the sum of the annual salary as set by the General Appropriations Act in accordance with Section 659.012 paid to a district judge with comparable years of service as the statutory county court judge and any state or county contributions and supplements paid to a district judge in the county, other than contributions received as compensation under Section 74.051. A statutory county court judge's total annual salary includes any state or county contributions and supplements paid to the judge. For purposes of this subsection, the years of service of a statutory county court judge include any years of service as: (1)  an appellate court, district court, multicounty statutory county court, or statutory probate court justice or judge; [or] (2)  a full-time district court, multicounty statutory county court, or statutory probate court associate judge; or (3)  a district attorney, criminal district attorney, or county attorney. SECTION 2.04.  Section 25.0007(c), Government Code, is amended to read as follows: (c)  In a civil case pending in a statutory county court in which the matter in controversy exceeds $325,000 [$250,000], the jury shall be composed of 12 members unless all of the parties agree to a jury composed of a lesser number of jurors. SECTION 2.05.  Section 25.00212, Government Code, is amended by amending Subsection (a) and adding Subsection (a-1) to read as follows: (a)  At the end of each state fiscal year, the comptroller shall determine: (1)  the amounts deposited in the judicial fund under Section 133.151(c)(1), Local Government Code, from [by] statutory probate courts fees remitted under Section 133.151(a)(1), Local Government Code, either: (A)  directly to the treasury by the Office of Court Administration of the Texas Judicial System for fees paid using the electronic filing system established under Section 72.031; or (B)  to the comptroller in the manner provided by Subchapter B, Chapter 133, Local Government Code, for fees paid to an officer of a court; and (2)  the sum of the amount paid under Section 25.0022(e) and the total amounts paid to the counties under Section 25.00211. (a-1)  If the comptroller determines the total amount deposited in the judicial fund by statutory probate courts in all counties as calculated under Subsection (a)(1) exceeds the sum calculated under Subsection (a)(2) [that sum], the comptroller [state] shall remit the excess proportionately to each county that contributed [deposited] a greater amount to [in] the judicial fund from fees collected by a statutory probate court than the amount the county was paid under Section 25.00211, as adjusted in an equitable manner to reflect the differences in the total amounts paid to the counties under Section 25.00211. SECTION 2.06.  Section 25.0022(f), Government Code, is amended to read as follows: (f)  Each county pays annually to the presiding judge, from fees allocated to the judicial education and support fund under [collected pursuant to] Section 135.102 [118.052(2)(A)(vi)], Local Government Code, the amount of the salary apportioned [to it] as provided by this section and the other expenses authorized by this section. The presiding judge shall place each county's payment of salary and other expenses in an administrative fund, from which the salary and other expenses are paid. The salary shall be paid in equal monthly installments. SECTION 2.07.  Section 25.0062(b), Government Code, is amended to read as follows: (b)  The district clerk serves as clerk of a county court at law in felony cases, in family law cases and proceedings, and in civil cases in which the matter in controversy exceeds $325,000 [$250,000]. The county clerk serves as clerk of a county court at law in all other cases. The district clerk shall establish a separate docket for a county court at law. The commissioners court shall provide the deputy clerks, bailiffs, and other personnel necessary to operate a county court at law. SECTION 2.08.  (a)  Section 25.0092, Government Code, is amended by amending Subsections (a) and (d) and adding Subsection (c-1) to read as follows: (a)  In addition to the jurisdiction provided by Section 25.0003 and other law, and except as limited by Subsection (b), a county court at law in Atascosa County has concurrent jurisdiction with the district court in: (1)  Class A and Class B misdemeanor cases; (2)  family law matters; (3)  juvenile matters; (4)  probate matters; [and] (5)  appeals from the justice and municipal courts; and (6)  civil cases in which the matter in controversy exceeds the maximum amount provided by Section 25.0003 but does not exceed $1 million, excluding interest, statutory or punitive damages and penalties, and attorney's fees and costs, as alleged on the face of the petition, including: (A)  a suit to decide the issue of title to real or personal property; (B)  a suit for the enforcement of a lien on real property; (C)  a suit for the trial of the right to property valued at $500 or more that has been levied on under a writ of execution, sequestration, or attachment; and (D)  a suit for the recovery of real property. (c-1)  In addition to other assignments provided by law, a judge of the county court at law in Atascosa County is subject to assignment under Chapter 74 to any district court in Atascosa County.  A county court at law judge assigned to a district court may hear any matter pending in the district court. (d)  The judge of a county court at law shall be paid as provided by Section 25.0005 [a total annual salary set by the commissioners court at an amount that is not less than $1,000 less than the total annual salary received by a district judge in the county.  A district judge's or statutory county court judge's total annual salary does not include contributions and supplements paid by a county]. (b)  Section 25.0092(a), Government Code, as amended by this section, applies only to a case filed or proceeding commenced on or after the effective date of this Act. A case filed or proceeding commenced before that date is governed by the law in effect on the date the case was filed or the proceeding was commenced, and the former law is continued in effect for that purpose. SECTION 2.09.  Section 25.0212, Government Code, is amended by amending Subsections (a), (b), and (f) and adding Subsections (i) and (j) to read as follows: (a)  In addition to the jurisdiction provided by Section 25.0003 and other law and except as limited by Subsection (b), a county court at law in Bowie County has, concurrent with the district court, the jurisdiction provided by the constitution and by general law for district courts, including concurrent jurisdiction in: (1)  specialty court programs; (2)  misdemeanor cases; (3)  family law cases and proceedings, including juvenile matters; and (4)  probate and guardianship matters. (b)  A county court at law does not have jurisdiction of: (1)  felony criminal matters; (2)  suits on behalf of the state to recover penalties or escheated property; (3)  misdemeanors involving official misconduct; (4)  contested elections; or (5)  civil cases in which the matter in controversy exceeds the amount provided in Section 25.0003 [$200,000], excluding interest, statutory or punitive damages and penalties, and attorney's fees and costs, as alleged on the face of the petition. (f)  The [commissioners court may authorize the judge of a county court at law to set the] official court reporter of a county court at law is entitled to compensation, fees, and allowances in amounts equal to the amounts paid to the official court reporters serving the district courts in Bowie County, including an annual salary set by the judge of the county court at law and approved by the commissioners court [reporter's salary]. (i)  The jury in all civil or criminal matters is composed of 12 members, except in misdemeanor criminal cases and any other case in which the court has concurrent jurisdiction with county courts under Section 25.0003(a), the jury is composed of six members. (j)  In matters of concurrent jurisdiction, a judge of a county court at law and a judge of a district court with jurisdiction in Bowie County may transfer cases between the courts in the same manner that judges of district courts may transfer cases under Section 24.003. SECTION 2.10.  (a)  Section 25.1031(a), Government Code, is amended to read as follows: (a)  Harris County has the following county civil courts at law: (1)  County Civil Court at Law No. 1 of Harris County, Texas; (2)  County Civil Court at Law No. 2 of Harris County, Texas; (3)  County Civil Court at Law No. 3 of Harris County, Texas; [and] (4)  County Civil Court at Law No. 4 of Harris County, Texas; and (5)  County Civil Court at Law No. 5 of Harris County, Texas. (b)  The County Civil Court at Law No. 5 of Harris County is created on the effective date of this Act. SECTION 2.11.  (a)  Section 25.1101(b), Government Code, is amended to read as follows: (b)  Hidalgo County has the following statutory probate courts: (1)  [one statutory probate court, the] Probate Court No. 1 of Hidalgo County; and (2)  Probate Court No. 2 of Hidalgo County. (b)  On the effective date of this section: (1)  Probate Court No. 2 of Hidalgo County is created; and (2)  the Probate Court of Hidalgo County is redesignated as Probate Court No. 1 of Hidalgo County. (c)  This section takes effect immediately if this Act receives a vote of two-thirds of all the members elected to each house, as provided by Section 39, Article III, Texas Constitution. If this Act does not receive the vote necessary for immediate effect, this section takes effect on the effective date of this Act. SECTION 2.12.  (a)  Section 25.1102(a), Government Code, is amended to read as follows: (a)  In addition to the jurisdiction provided by Section 25.0003 and other law, a county court at law in Hidalgo County has concurrent jurisdiction with the district court in: (1)  family law cases and proceedings; and (2)  civil cases [in which the matter in controversy does not exceed $750,000, excluding interest, statutory or punitive damages and penalties, and attorney's fees and costs, as alleged on the page of the petition]. (b)  Section 25.1102(a), Government Code, as amended by this section, applies only to an action filed in a county court at law in Hidalgo County on or after the effective date of this section.  An action filed in a county court at law in Hidalgo County before the effective date of this section is governed by the law in effect on the date the action was filed, and the former law is continued in effect for that purpose. (c)  This section takes effect immediately if this Act receives a vote of two-thirds of all the members elected to each house, as provided by Section 39, Article III, Texas Constitution. If this Act does not receive the vote necessary for immediate effect, this section takes effect on the effective date of this Act. SECTION 2.13.  (a)  Subchapter C, Chapter 25, Government Code, is amended by adding Section 25.1563 to read as follows: Sec. 25.1563.  MAVERICK COUNTY. Maverick County has one statutory county court, the County Court at Law of Maverick County. (b)  The County Court at Law of Maverick County is created on the effective date of this Act. SECTION 2.14.  Section 25.1902(b-1), Government Code, is amended to read as follows: (b-1)  In addition to the jurisdiction provided by Subsections (a) and (b), the county courts at law in [County Court at Law No. 1 of] Potter County have [has] concurrent jurisdiction with the district court in felony cases to conduct arraignments, conduct pretrial hearings, and accept pleas in uncontested matters. SECTION 2.15.  Section 25.2282, Government Code, is amended by adding Subsection (b) to read as follows: (b)  In addition to the jurisdiction provided by Section 25.0003 and other law, a county court at law in Tom Green County has concurrent jurisdiction with the district court in family law cases and proceedings. SECTION 2.16.  Sections 25.2452(b), (c), (d), and (e), Government Code, are amended to read as follows: (b)  All misdemeanor cases, probate and mental health matters, proceedings under the Estates Code, and appeals from municipal courts of record shall be filed in the county court at law.  A county court at law may transfer a case or an appeal described by this subsection to the county court with the consent of the county judge. (c)  Except as provided by Section 25.0003 and Subsection (d), a county court at law has concurrent jurisdiction with the district court in: (1)  family law cases and proceedings under the Family Code; [and] (2)  civil cases in which the amount in controversy exceeds $500 but does not exceed $200,000, excluding interest, exemplary damages, penalties, attorney's fees, and court costs; (3)  felony cases to accept guilty pleas; and (4)  appeals from the justice courts. (d)  A county court at law does not have jurisdiction of: (1)  a case under: (A)  the Alcoholic Beverage Code; (B)  the Election Code; or (C)  the Tax Code; or (2)  a matter over which the district court has exclusive jurisdiction[; or [(3)  a civil case, other than a case under the Family Code or the Estates Code, in which the amount in controversy is: [(A)  less than the maximum amount in controversy allowed the justice court in Wichita County; or [(B)  more than $200,000, exclusive of punitive or exemplary damages, penalties, interest, costs, and attorney's fees]. (e)  On the motion of any party, a county court at law may transfer a civil case originally filed in a county court at law that exceeds the maximum amount in controversy described by Subsection (c)(2) [(d)(3)(B)] to the district court in Wichita County, except that an announcement of ready for trial by all parties before a motion to transfer the case to the district court is filed confers original jurisdiction on the county court at law.  A case that is transferred to the district court shall be completed under the same cause number and in the same manner as if the case were originally filed in the district court. SECTION 2.17.  Section 25.2704(a), Government Code, is amended to read as follows: (a)  In addition to the jurisdiction provided by Section 25.0003 and other law, the 2nd Multicounty Court at Law has concurrent jurisdiction with the district courts, including [except] in civil cases in which the matter in controversy exceeds the maximum amount provided by Section 25.0003(c)(1). SECTION 2.18.  (a)  Sections 25.0212(d) and 25.1723(c), Government Code, are repealed. (b)  Section 25.1723(c), Government Code, as repealed by this section, applies only to an action filed on or after the effective date of this Act. An action filed before that date is governed by the law in effect immediately before that date, and that law is continued in effect for that purpose. SECTION 2.19.  Sections 25.0003(c), 25.0007(c), and 25.0062(b), Government Code, as amended by this article, apply only to a civil case filed in a statutory county court on or after the effective date of this Act.  A civil case filed in a statutory county court before that date is governed by the law in effect immediately before that date, and the former law is continued in effect for that purpose. SECTION 2.20.  Section 25.00212, Government Code, as amended by this article, applies to amounts deposited in the judicial fund under Section 133.151(c)(1), Local Government Code, from fees collected by a statutory probate court before, on, or after the effective date of this Act. SECTION 2.21.  Section 25.2282, Government Code, as amended by this article, applies only to a case filed or proceeding commenced on or after the effective date of this Act. A case filed or proceeding commenced before that date is governed by the law in effect on the date the action was filed, and the former law is continued in effect for that purpose. SECTION 2.22.  Section 25.2452, Government Code, as amended by this article, applies only to an action filed in a county court at law in Wichita County on or after the effective date of this Act. An action filed in a county court at law in Wichita County before that date is governed by the law in effect on the date the action was filed, and the former law is continued in effect for that purpose. SECTION 2.23.  Section 25.2704(a), Government Code, as amended by this article, applies only to a case filed or proceeding commenced on or after the effective date of this Act.  A case filed or proceeding commenced before that date is governed by the law in effect on the date the case was filed or the proceeding was commenced, and the former law is continued in effect for that purpose. ARTICLE 3. MUNICIPAL COURT PROVISIONS SECTION 3.01.  Section 29.014, Government Code, is amended by amending Subsections (c) and (d) and adding Subsection (e) to read as follows: (c)  The committee shall establish the policies and procedures necessary to provide adequate security to the municipal courts served by the presiding or municipal judge, as applicable, including by developing a court emergency management plan. (d)  A committee shall [may] recommend to the municipality the uses of resources and expenditures of money for courthouse security, but may not direct the assignment of those resources or the expenditure of those funds. (e)  Notwithstanding Section 551.001 or 552.003, a court security committee established under this section is not a governmental body for the purposes of Chapter 551 or 552. SECTION 3.02.  Section 30.00007, Government Code, is amended by amending Subsections (b) and (c) and adding Subsection (d) to read as follows: (b)  The presiding judge shall: (1)  maintain a central docket for cases filed within the territorial limits of the municipality over which the municipal courts of record have jurisdiction; (2)  provide for the distribution of cases from the central docket to the individual municipal judges to equalize the distribution of business in the courts; (3)  request the jurors needed for cases that are set for trial by jury; (4)  temporarily assign judges or substitute judges to exchange benches and to act for each other in a proceeding pending in a court if necessary for the expeditious disposition of business in the courts; (5)  supervise and control the operation and clerical functions of the administrative department of each court, including the court's personnel, during the proceedings of the court; and (6)  establish a court security committee to adopt security policies and procedures for the courts served by the presiding judge, including by developing a court emergency management plan, that is composed of: (A)  the presiding judge, or the presiding judge's designee, who serves as presiding officer of the committee; (B)  a representative of the law enforcement agency or other entity that provides the primary security for the court; (C)  a representative of the municipality; and (D)  any other person the committee determines necessary to assist the committee. (c)  A court security committee shall [may] recommend to the governing body the uses of resources and expenditures of money for courthouse security, but may not direct the assignment of those resources or the expenditure of those funds. (d)  Notwithstanding Section 551.001 or 552.003, a court security committee established under this section is not a governmental body for the purposes of Chapter 551 or 552. SECTION 3.03.  Section 30.01014(d), Government Code, is amended to read as follows: (d)  [In addition to satisfying the requirements of Section 30.00006(c), a municipal judge must maintain residence in the city during the tenure of office and must be a resident of the city at the time of appointment or election.] The judge shall devote as much time to the office as it requires. SECTION 3.04.  Chapter 30, Government Code, is amended by adding Subchapter AAA to read as follows: SUBCHAPTER AAA. CANYON Sec. 30.01911.  APPLICABILITY. This subchapter applies to the city of Canyon. Sec. 30.01912.  JUDGE. A municipal judge for the city of Canyon is not required to be a resident of the city. SECTION 3.05.  As soon as practicable after the effective date of this Act, a court security committee shall develop a court emergency management plan as required by Section 29.014 or 30.00007, Government Code, as amended by this article. ARTICLE 4. VISITING JUDGES SECTION 4.01.  Sections 25.0022(d), (h), (k), (o), (t), (u), and (w), Government Code, are amended to read as follows: (d)  The presiding judge shall: (1)  ensure the promulgation of local rules of administration in accordance with policies and guidelines set by the supreme court; (2)  advise local statutory probate court judges on case flow management practices and auxiliary court services; (3)  perform a duty of a local administrative statutory probate court judge if the local administrative judge does not perform that duty; (4)  appoint an assistant presiding judge of the statutory probate courts; (5)  call and preside over annual meetings of the judges of the statutory probate courts at a time and place in the state as designated by the presiding judge; (6)  call and convene other meetings of the judges of the statutory probate courts as considered necessary by the presiding judge to promote the orderly and efficient administration of justice in the statutory probate courts; (7)  study available statistics reflecting the condition of the dockets of the probate courts in the state to determine the need for the assignment of judges under this section; (8)  compare local rules of court to achieve uniformity of rules to the extent practical and consistent with local conditions; (9)  assign or order the clerk who serves the statutory probate courts to randomly assign a judge or former or retired judge of a statutory probate court or a former or retired justice of an appellate court to hear a case under Section 25.002201(a) or 25.00255, as applicable; and (10)  require the local administrative judge for statutory probate courts in a county to ensure that all statutory probate courts in the county comply with Chapter 37. (h)  Subject to Section 25.002201, a judge or a former or retired judge of a statutory probate court or a former or retired justice of an appellate court may be assigned by the presiding judge of the statutory probate courts to hold court in a statutory probate court, a county court, or any statutory court exercising probate jurisdiction when: (1)  a statutory probate judge requests assignment of another judge to the judge's court; (2)  a statutory probate judge is absent, disabled, or disqualified for any reason; (3)  a statutory probate judge is present or is trying cases as authorized by the constitution and laws of this state and the condition of the court's docket makes it necessary to appoint an additional judge; (4)  the office of a statutory probate judge is vacant; (5)  the presiding judge of an administrative judicial district requests the assignment of a statutory probate judge to hear a probate matter in a county court or statutory county court; (6)  the statutory probate judge is recused or disqualified as described by Section 25.002201(a); (7)  a county court judge requests the assignment of a statutory probate judge to hear a probate matter in the county court; or (8)  a local administrative statutory probate court judge requests the assignment of a statutory probate judge to hear a matter in a statutory probate court. (k)  The daily compensation of a former or retired judge or justice for purposes of this section is set at an amount equal to the daily compensation of a judge of a statutory probate court in the county in which the former or retired judge or justice is assigned. A former or retired judge or justice assigned to a county that does not have a statutory probate court shall be paid an amount equal to the daily compensation of a judge of a statutory probate court in the county where the assigned judge or justice was last elected. (o)  The county in which the assigned judge served shall pay out of the general fund of the county: (1)  expenses certified under Subsection (m) to the assigned judge; and (2)  the salary certified under Subsection (m) to the county in which the assigned judge serves, or, if the assigned judge is a former or retired judge or justice, to the assigned judge. (t)  To be eligible for assignment under this section, a former or retired judge of a statutory probate court or a former or retired justice of an appellate court must: (1)  not have been removed from office; (2)  certify under oath to the presiding judge, on a form prescribed by the state board of regional judges, that: (A)  the judge or justice has not been publicly reprimanded or censured by the State Commission on Judicial Conduct; and (B)  the judge or justice: (i)  did not resign or retire from office after the State Commission on Judicial Conduct notified the judge or justice of the commencement of a full investigation into an allegation or appearance of misconduct or disability of the judge or justice as provided in Section 33.022 and before the final disposition of that investigation; or (ii)  if the judge or justice did resign from office under circumstances described by Subparagraph (i), was not publicly reprimanded or censured as a result of the investigation; (3)  annually demonstrate that the judge or justice has completed in the past state fiscal year the educational requirements for an active statutory probate court judge; (4)  have served as an active judge or justice for at least 72 months in a district, statutory probate, statutory county, or appellate court; and (5)  have developed substantial experience in the judge's or justice's area of specialty. (u)  In addition to the eligibility requirements under Subsection (t), to be eligible for assignment under this section in the judge's or justice's county of residence, a former or retired judge of a statutory probate court or a former or retired justice of an appellate court must certify to the presiding judge a willingness not to: (1)  appear and plead as an attorney in any court in the judge's county of residence for a period of two years; and (2)  accept appointment as a guardian ad litem, guardian of the estate of an incapacitated person, or guardian of the person of an incapacitated person in any court in the judge's or justice's county of residence for a period of two years. (w)  A former or retired judge or justice who is assigned under this section is not an employee of the county in which the assigned court is located. SECTION 4.02.  Section 25.002201, Government Code, is amended to read as follows: Sec. 25.002201.  ASSIGNMENT OF JUDGE ON RECUSAL OR DISQUALIFICATION. (a)  Except as provided by Subsection (b), not later than the 15th day after the date an order of recusal or disqualification of a statutory probate court judge is issued in a case, the presiding judge shall assign a statutory probate court judge or a former or retired judge of a statutory probate court or a former or retired justice of an appellate court to hear the case if: (1)  the judge of the statutory probate court recused himself or herself under Section 25.00255(g)(1)(A); (2)  the judge of the statutory probate court disqualified himself or herself under Section 25.00255(g-1); (3)  the order was issued under Section 25.00255(i-3)(1); or (4)  the presiding judge receives notice and a request for assignment from the clerk of the statutory probate court under Section 25.00255(l). (b)  If the judge who is the subject of an order of recusal or disqualification is the presiding judge of the statutory probate courts, the chief justice of the supreme court shall assign a statutory probate judge, [or] a former or retired judge of a statutory probate court, or a former or retired justice of an appellate court to hear the case. SECTION 4.03.  Section 25.00255, Government Code, is amended by amending Subsection (a) and adding Subsections (b) and (c) to read as follows: (a)  Notwithstanding any conflicting provision in the Texas Rules of Civil Procedure, Rules 18a and 18b, Texas Rules of Civil Procedure, apply to the recusal and disqualification of a statutory probate court judge except as otherwise provided by this section or another provision of this subchapter.  The presiding judge: (1)  has the authority and shall perform the functions and duties of the presiding judge of the administrative judicial region under the rules, including the duty to hear or rule on a referred motion of recusal or disqualification or, subject to Subdivisions (2) and (3), assign a judge to hear and rule on a referred motion of recusal or disqualification; (2)  may assign a presiding judge of the administrative judicial region to hear and rule on a referred motion of recusal or disqualification only with the consent of the presiding judge of the administrative judicial region; (3)  may not assign a judge of a statutory probate court located in the same county as the statutory probate court served by the judge who is the subject of the motion of recusal or disqualification; and (4)  if the presiding judge is the subject of the motion of recusal or disqualification, shall sign and file with the clerk an order referring the motion to the chief justice of the supreme court for assignment of a presiding judge of an administrative judicial region, a statutory probate court judge, [or] a former or retired judge of a statutory probate court, or a former or retired justice of an appellate court to hear and rule on the motion, subject to Subdivisions (2) and (3). (b)  The presiding judge may deny a motion of recusal or disqualification that does not comply with Rule 18a, Texas Rules of Civil Procedure, without a hearing.  An order denying a motion under this subsection must state the manner in which the motion fails to comply with that rule. (c)  A motion of recusal or disqualification that does not comply with Rule 18a, Texas Rules of Civil Procedure, is a motion or disqualification for the purpose of determining whether a tertiary recusal motion has been filed under Section 25.00256, regardless of whether the motion was amended after filing. SECTION 4.04.  Section 74.003(e), Government Code, is amended to read as follows: (e)  A retired justice or judge assigned as provided by this section is entitled to receive, pro rata for the time serving on assignment, from money appropriated from the general revenue fund for that purpose, an amount equal to the compensation received from state and county sources by a justice of the court of appeals to which assigned.  A former justice or judge assigned as provided by this section is entitled to receive, pro rata for the time serving on assignment, from money appropriated from the general revenue fund for that purpose, an amount equal to the compensation from the state received by a justice of the court of appeals to which assigned, and from county sources, an amount equal to the compensation received from county sources by a justice of the court of appeals to which assigned.  For purposes of determining the amount to be paid to a former or retired justice or judge under this subsection, the compensation received from the state by a justice of the court of appeals to which the retired justice or judge is assigned is the amount equal to the state [base] salary paid in accordance with Section 659.012(b) to a justice of that court of appeals with comparable years of service as the retired justice or judge on the retired justice's or judge's last day of service in judicial office [as set by the General Appropriations Act in accordance with Section 659.012(a)]. SECTION 4.05.  Section 74.046(b), Government Code, is amended to read as follows: (b)  A presiding judge may appoint a judicial mentor or arrange for additional administrative personnel to be assigned to a court identified by the Office of Court Administration of the Texas Judicial System as needing additional assistance under Section 72.024(b-1). A former or retired judge or justice assigned as a judicial mentor under this subsection is entitled to the same salary, compensation, and expenses under Section 74.061 that the judge or justice would be entitled to if the judge or justice had been assigned under this chapter to serve as the judge of a trial court in the administrative judicial region of the court to which the judge or justice is assigned as a judicial mentor. SECTION 4.06.  Section 74.059, Government Code, is amended by adding Subsection (a-1) to read as follows: (a-1)  A judge assigned under the provisions of this chapter to a court that sits in a county located in the Texas-Mexico border region, as defined by Section 2056.002(e), may conduct a proceeding, other than a trial, or perform a judicial action from any location in this state using videoconference, teleconference, or other available electronic means if authorized by the order of assignment. SECTION 4.07.  Section 74.061, Government Code, is amended by amending Subsections (h), (i), and (k) and adding Subsection (k-1) to read as follows: (h)  Notwithstanding Subsection (c), the salary from the state of a retired judge or justice assigned to a district court is determined pro rata based on the sum of the regular judge's salary from the county plus the amount of the state [base] salary paid in accordance with Section 659.012(b) to a district judge with comparable years of service as the retired judge or justice on the retired judge's or justice's last day of service in judicial office [as set by the General Appropriations Act in accordance with Section 659.012(a)]. (i)  Notwithstanding Subsection (d), the salary from the state of a former judge or justice assigned to a district court is determined pro rata based on the amount of the state [base] salary paid in accordance with Section 659.012(b) to a district judge with comparable years of service as the retired judge or justice on the retired judge's or justice's last day of service in judicial office [as set by the General Appropriations Act in accordance with Section 659.012(a)]. (k)  Except as provided by Subsection (k-1) and notwithstanding [Notwithstanding] any other provision of law, a former, retired, or active judge is not entitled to compensation paid by the state when the judge sits as an assigned judge for a statutory county court. (k-1)  Notwithstanding any other provision, a former or retired judge or justice assigned under this chapter to a constitutional county court in a county located in the Texas-Mexico border region, as defined by Section 2056.002(e), is entitled to compensation from the state in an amount equal to the maximum salary a district judge may receive from county and state sources under Section 659.012(a) if the presiding judge of the administrative judicial region in which the county lies certifies that exigent circumstances require the assignment. SECTION 4.08.  This article takes effect immediately if this Act receives a vote of two-thirds of all the members elected to each house, as provided by Section 39, Article III, Texas Constitution. If this Act does not receive the vote necessary for immediate effect, this article takes effect on the effective date of this Act. ARTICLE 5.  MASTERS, MAGISTRATES, REFEREES, AND ASSOCIATE JUDGES SECTION 5.01.  Article 2A.151, Code of Criminal Procedure, as amended by S.B. 251, Acts of the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, and by H.B. 1620, Acts of the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, and effective September 1, 2025, is reenacted and amended to read as follows: Art. 2A.151.  TYPES OF MAGISTRATES.  The following officers are magistrates for purposes of this code: (1)  a justice of the supreme court; (2)  a judge of the court of criminal appeals; (3)  a justice of the courts of appeals; (4)  a judge of a district court; (5)  an associate judge appointed by: (A)  a judge of a district court or a statutory county court that gives preference to criminal cases in Jefferson County; (B)  a judge of a district court or a statutory county court of Brazos County, Nueces County, or Williamson County; [or] (C)  a judge of a district court under Chapter 54A, Government Code; or (D)  a judge of a district court under Subchapter B, Chapter 54B, Government Code; (6)  a criminal magistrate appointed by: (A)  the Bell County Commissioners Court; (B)  the Brazoria County Commissioners Court; or (C)  the Burnet County Commissioners Court; (7)  a criminal law hearing officer for: (A)  Harris County appointed under Subchapter L, Chapter 54, Government Code; or (B)  Cameron County appointed under Subchapter BB, Chapter 54, Government Code; (8)  a magistrate appointed: (A)  by a judge of a district court of Bexar County, Dallas County, or Tarrant County that gives preference to criminal cases; (B)  by a judge of a criminal district court of Dallas County or Tarrant County; (C)  by a judge of a district court or statutory county court of Denton or Grayson County; (D)  by a judge of a district court or statutory county court that gives preference to criminal cases in Travis County; (E)  by the El Paso Council of Judges; (F)  by the Fort Bend County Commissioners Court; (G)  by the Collin County Commissioners Court; or (H)  under Subchapter JJ, Chapter 54, Government Code; (9)  a magistrate or associate judge appointed by a judge of a district court of Lubbock County, Nolan County, or Webb County; (10)  a county judge; (11)  a judge of: (A)  a statutory county court; (B)  a county criminal court; or (C)  a statutory probate court; (12)  an associate judge appointed by a judge of a statutory probate court under Chapter 54A, Government Code; (13)  a justice of the peace; and (14)  a mayor or recorder of a municipality or a judge of a municipal court. SECTION 5.02.  Section 54.1601(b), Government Code, as added by S.B. 251, Acts of the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, is amended to read as follows: (b)  The commissioners court shall establish the minimum qualifications, salary, benefits, and other compensation of each magistrate position and shall determine whether the position is full-time or part-time.  Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, to be eligible for appointment under this subchapter, a person must [The qualifications must require the magistrate to: [(1)  have served as a justice of the peace or municipal court judge; or [(2)]  have been licensed to practice law in this state and in good standing with the State Bar of Texas for at least two years. SECTION 5.03.  Chapter 54B, Government Code, is amended by adding Subchapter B to read as follows: SUBCHAPTER B.  CRIMINAL ASSOCIATE JUDGES IN COKE, CONCHO, IRION, RUNNELS, SCHLEICHER, STERLING, AND TOM GREEN COUNTIES Sec. 54B.031.  APPOINTMENT. (a)  A judge of the 51st, 119th, 340th, or 391st district court may appoint a full-time or part-time criminal associate judge to perform the duties authorized by this subchapter if the commissioners court of the county in which the court has jurisdiction has authorized the creation of an associate judge position. (b)  If a court has jurisdiction in more than one county, an associate judge appointed by that court may serve only in a county in which the commissioners court has authorized the appointment. (c)  If more than one court in a county is subject to this subchapter, the commissioners court may authorize the appointment of an associate judge for each court or may authorize one or more associate judges to share service with two or more courts. (d)  If an associate judge serves more than one court, the associate judge's appointment must be made as established by local rule, but in no event by less than a vote of two-thirds of the judges under whom the associate judge serves. Sec. 54B.032.  APPLICABILITY. Except as provided by Section 54B.033, Subchapter A, Chapter 54A applies to a criminal associate judge appointed under this subchapter. Sec. 54B.033.  PROCEEDINGS THAT MAY BE REFERRED. (a)  A judge may refer to a criminal associate judge any criminal case or matter relating to a criminal case for proceedings involving: (1)  a negotiated plea of guilty or no contest and sentencing before the court; (2)  a bond forfeiture, remittitur, and related proceedings; (3)  a pretrial motion; (4)  a writ of habeas corpus; (5)  an examining trial; (6)  an occupational driver's license; (7)  a petition for an order of expunction under Chapter 55A, Code of Criminal Procedure; (8)  an asset forfeiture hearing as provided by Chapter 59, Code of Criminal Procedure; (9)  a petition for an order of nondisclosure of criminal history record information or an order of nondisclosure of criminal history record information that does not require a petition provided by Subchapter E-1, Chapter 411; (10)  a motion to modify or revoke community supervision or to proceed with an adjudication of guilty; (11)  setting conditions, modifying, revoking, and surrendering of bonds, including surety bonds; (12)  specialty court proceedings; (13)  a waiver of extradition; and (14)  any other matter the judge considers necessary and proper. (b)  A judge may refer to a criminal associate judge a civil case arising out of Chapter 59, Code of Criminal Procedure, for any purpose authorized by that chapter, including issuing orders, accepting agreed judgments, enforcing judgments, and presiding over a case on the merits if a party has not requested a jury trial. (c)  A criminal associate judge may accept a plea of guilty from a defendant charged with misdemeanor, felony, or both misdemeanor and felony offenses. (d)  A criminal associate judge may select a jury. A criminal associate judge may not preside over a criminal trial on the merits, whether or not the trial is before a jury. (e)  A criminal associate judge may not hear a jury trial on the merits of a bond forfeiture. (f)  A judge of a designated juvenile court may refer to a criminal associate judge any proceeding over which a juvenile court has exclusive original jurisdiction under Title 3, Family Code, including any matter ancillary to the proceeding. ARTICLE 6.  JUVENILE BOARDS SECTION 6.01.  Section 152.0191(a), Human Resources Code, is amended to read as follows: (a)  The juvenile board of Bee County is composed of the county judge, [and] the district judges in Bee County, and the judge of the 2nd Multicounty Court at Law. SECTION 6.02.  Section 152.0521(a), Human Resources Code, is amended to read as follows: (a)  The Comal County Juvenile Board is composed of: (1)  the county judge; (2)  the local administrative statutory county court judge [of each county court at law in the county]; (3)  an elected judicial officer of Comal County appointed by the local administrative statutory county court judge; (4)  the local administrative district judge [of the 22nd District Court]; (5)  two elected judicial officers of Comal County appointed by the local administrative district judge [(4)  the judge of the 207th District Court]; and [(5)  the judge of the 433rd District Court;] (6)  [the judge of the 274th District Court; and [(7)]  the criminal district attorney of Comal County. SECTION 6.03.  Section 152.0971(a), Human Resources Code, is amended to read as follows: (a)  The juvenile board of Grayson County is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Grayson County. The county judge may add a judge of a county court at law to the board. SECTION 6.04.  Section 152.1551(a), Human Resources Code, is amended to read as follows: (a)  The juvenile board of Live Oak County is composed of the county judge, [and] the district judges in Live Oak County, and the judge of the 2nd Multicounty Court at Law. SECTION 6.05.  Section 152.1621(a), Human Resources Code, is amended to read as follows: (a)  The juvenile board of McMullen County is composed of the county judge, [and] the district judges in McMullen County, and the judge of the 2nd Multicounty Court at Law. ARTICLE 7.  COURT ADMINISTRATION SECTION 7.01.  Articles 45A.302(b), (c), and (d), Code of Criminal Procedure, are amended to read as follows: (b)  In issuing the order of deferral, the judge may impose a special expense fee [fine] on the defendant in an amount not to exceed the amount of the fine that could be imposed on the defendant as punishment for the offense. (c)  The fee [fine] described by Subsection (b) may be collected at any time before the date on which the period of deferral ends.  A judge who orders the collection of the fee [fine] must require that the amount of the fee [fine] be credited toward the payment of the amount of any fine imposed by the judge as punishment for the offense. (d)  The judge may elect not to impose the special expense fee [fine] for good cause shown by the defendant. SECTION 7.02.  (a) Subchapter A, Chapter 102, Code of Criminal Procedure, is amended by adding Article 102.0061 to read as follows: Art. 102.0061.  FEES IN EXPUNCTION PROCEEDINGS. (a) In addition to any other fees required by other law and except as provided by Subsections (c) and (d), a petitioner seeking expunction of a criminal record in a district court shall pay the fee charged for filing an ex parte petition in a civil action in district court. (b)  In addition to any other fees required by other law and except as provided by Subsection (c), a petitioner seeking expunction of a criminal record in a justice court or a municipal court of record under Chapter 55A shall pay a fee of $100 for filing an ex parte petition for expunction to defray the cost of notifying state agencies of orders of expunction under that chapter. (c)  The fee under Subsection (a) or the fee under Subsection (b), as applicable, shall be waived if: (1)  the petitioner seeks expunction of a criminal record that relates to an arrest for an offense of which the person was acquitted, other than an acquittal for an offense described by Article 55A.151; and (2)  the petition for expunction is filed not later than the 30th day after the date of the acquittal. (d)  The fee under Subsection (a) shall be waived if the petitioner is entitled to expunction: (1)  under Article 55A.053(a)(2)(A) after successful completion of a veterans treatment court program created under Chapter 124, Government Code, or former law; or (2)  under Article 55A.053(a)(2)(B) after successful completion of a mental health court program created under Chapter 125, Government Code, or former law. (e)  A court that grants a petition for expunction of a criminal record may order the fee, or portion of the fee, required to be paid under Subsection (a) to be returned to the petitioner. (b)  This section takes effect January 1, 2026. SECTION 7.03.  Article 102.017, Code of Criminal Procedure, is amended by adding Subsection (e-1) to read as follows: (e-1)  In administering or directing funds under Subsection (e), a commissioners court shall consider the recommendations provided by a court security committee under Section 74.0922, Government Code, and the governing body of a municipality shall consider the recommendations provided by a court security committee under Sections 29.014(d) and 30.00007(c), Government Code. SECTION 7.04.  (a)  The heading to Section 22.110, Government Code, is amended to read as follows: Sec. 22.110.  JUDICIAL INSTRUCTION RELATED TO FAMILY VIOLENCE, SEXUAL ASSAULT, TRAFFICKING OF PERSONS, AND CHILD AND ELDER ABUSE AND NEGLECT. (b)  Section 22.110, Government Code, is amended by amending Subsections (a), (b), and (d) and adding Subsection (b-1) to read as follows: (a)  The court of criminal appeals shall assure that judicial training related to the problems of family violence, sexual assault, trafficking of persons, [and] child abuse and neglect, and elder abuse and neglect is provided. (b)  The court of criminal appeals shall adopt the rules necessary to accomplish the purposes of this section. The rules must require: (1)  each district judge, judge of a statutory county court, associate judge appointed under Chapter 54A of this code or Chapter 201, Family Code, master, referee, and magistrate within the judge's first term of office or the judicial officer's first four years of service to complete and provide certification of completion of 12 hours of training that include at least: (A)  four hours dedicated to issues related to trafficking of persons, [and] child abuse and neglect, and elder abuse and neglect that cover at least two of the topics described in Subsections (d)(8) through (12) and (d)(14) [(d)(8)-(12)]; (B)  six hours dedicated to the training described by Subsections (d)(5), (6), and (7); and (C)  one hour dedicated to the training described by Subsection (d)(13); (2)  each judge and judicial officer during each additional term in office or four years of service to complete and provide certification of completion of an additional five hours of training that include at least: (A)  two hours dedicated to the training described by Subsections (d)(11) and (12); and (B)  one hour dedicated to the training described by Subsection (d)(13); and (3)  each judge of a court with primary responsibility for family law or family violence matters to complete and provide certification of completion of an additional hour of training described by Subsection (d)(13) every two years. (b-1)  The rules adopted under Subsection (b) must exempt from the training requirements of this section each judge or judicial officer, including an associate judge, who files an affidavit stating the judge or judicial officer does not hear cases involving family violence, sexual assault, trafficking of persons, child abuse and neglect, or elder abuse and neglect. (d)  The instruction must include information about: (1)  statutory and case law relating to videotaping a child's testimony and relating to competency of children to testify; (2)  methods for eliminating the trauma to the child caused by the court process; (3)  case law, statutory law, and procedural rules relating to family violence, sexual assault, trafficking of persons, and child abuse and neglect; (4)  methods for providing protection for victims of family violence, sexual assault, trafficking of persons, and child abuse and neglect; (5)  available community and state resources for counseling and other aid to victims and to offenders; (6)  gender bias in the judicial process; (7)  dynamics and effects of being a victim of sexual assault, trafficking of persons, or child abuse and neglect; (8)  dynamics of sexual abuse of children, including child abuse accommodation syndrome and grooming; (9)  impact of substance abuse on an unborn child and on a person's ability to care for a child; (10)  issues of attachment and bonding between children and caregivers; (11)  issues of child development that pertain to trafficking of persons and child abuse and neglect; (12)  medical findings regarding physical abuse, sexual abuse, trafficking of persons, and child abuse and neglect; [and] (13)  dynamics of family violence; and (14)  elder abuse and neglect. (c)  As soon as practicable after the effective date of this Act, the Texas Court of Criminal Appeals shall adopt the rules necessary to implement Section 22.110, Government Code, as amended by this article. (d)  Section 22.110, Government Code, as amended by this article, applies to all judges, masters, referees, and magistrates elected, appointed, or holding office on or after the effective date of this Act. SECTION 7.05.  Section 22.216(n-2), Government Code, is amended to read as follows: (n-2)  Notwithstanding Subsection (n-1), the Court of Appeals for the Fifteenth Court of Appeals District consists of a chief justice and of two justices holding places numbered consecutively beginning with Place 2 for the first three years following the court's creation.  Place 4 shall be created and the initial vacancy in that place shall be filled for the fourth year following the court's creation.  Place 5 shall be created and the initial vacancy in that place shall be filled for the fifth year following the court's creation. This subsection expires September 1, 2029 [2027]. SECTION 7.06.  Section 25A.003(d), Government Code, as amended by H.B. 40, Acts of the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, and effective September 1, 2025, is amended to read as follows: (d)  The Second Business Court Division is composed of the counties composing the Second Administrative Judicial Region under Section 74.042(c), excluding Montgomery County and Bastrop County, subject to funding through legislative appropriations. SECTION 7.07.  Section 25A.003(e), Government Code, is amended to read as follows: (e)  The Third Business Court Division is composed of the counties composing the Third Administrative Judicial Region under Section 74.042(d) and Bastrop County. SECTION 7.08.  Section 51.303, Government Code, is amended by amending Subsections (b) and (f) and adding Subsection (d) to read as follows: (b)  The clerk of a district court shall: (1)  record the acts and proceedings of the court; (2)  enter all judgments of the court under the direction of the judge; [and] (3)  record all executions issued and the returns on the executions; and (4)  accept an application for a protective order filed under Chapter 82, Family Code. (d)  Paper records must include a reference opposite each name to the minutes on which is entered the judgment in the case. (f)  A case with an electronic record must be searchable by each party's full name, the case number, and the date on which the record was made [In addition to the other powers and duties of this section, a district clerk shall accept applications for protective orders under Chapter 71, Family Code]. SECTION 7.09.  Section 51.903(d), Government Code, is amended to read as follows: (d)  The district clerk may not collect a filing fee under Section 12.005, Civil Practice and Remedies Code, for a filing [a motion] under this section. SECTION 7.10.  (a)  Subchapter C, Chapter 71, Government Code, is amended by adding Section 71.0354 to read as follows: Sec. 71.0354.  PROSECUTING ATTORNEY INFORMATION. (a) In this section, "prosecuting attorney" means a county attorney, district attorney, or criminal district attorney representing this state in criminal matters before the district or other courts of the county. (b)  Each prosecuting attorney shall report in the form and manner prescribed by the council information on: (1)  the categories of criminal offenses prosecuted by the prosecuting attorney and the number of criminal cases in each category; (2)  the number of personnel employed by the prosecuting attorney and whether that number is sufficient to support the prosecutor's caseload; (3)  the number of times a defendant was released as provided by Article 17.151, Code of Criminal Procedure; and (4)  the number of electronic notices submitted by the prosecuting attorney to a court as required by Article 17.027(a)(2), Code of Criminal Procedure. (c)  In prescribing the information to be submitted and form and manner of submission of the information under Subsection (b), the council shall consult with: (1)  the Texas District and County Attorneys Association; and (2)  other interested persons. (b)  Not later than September 1, 2026, the Texas Judicial Council shall prescribe the information, and form and manner of submission, a prosecuting attorney in this state is required to report under Section 71.0354, Government Code, as added by this article. SECTION 7.11.  Section 72.015(c), Government Code, is amended to read as follows: (c)  The judicial security division shall: (1)  serve as a central resource for information on local and national best practices for court security and the safety of court personnel; (2)  provide an expert opinion on the technical aspects of court security; [and] (3)  keep abreast of and provide training on recent court security improvements; and (4)  develop a model court emergency management plan as a resource for court security committees. SECTION 7.12.  Section 72.016, Government Code, is amended to read as follows: Sec. 72.016.  NOTIFICATION PROCEDURE FOR JUDICIAL PRIVACY. The director shall develop a procedure to regularly notify county registrars, the Department of Public Safety, the Texas Ethics Commission, and any other state or local government agency the office determines should be notified of the judges, judges' spouses, employees of the Office of Court Administration of the Texas Judicial System and entities administratively attached to the office, employees and commissioners of the State Commission on Judicial Conduct, and related family members whose personal information must be kept from public records, as provided under Sections 552.117 and 572.035 of this code, Sections 13.0021 and 15.0215, Election Code, Section 25.025, Tax Code, and Section 521.121, Transportation Code. SECTION 7.13.  Section 72.083, Government Code, is amended by adding Subsection (c) to read as follows: (c)  Notwithstanding Subsection (b), if the director determines a performance measure listed in Subsection (b) does not accurately reflect a court's performance in probate and mental health matters, the director may develop an alternative performance measure to assess the efficient and timely adjudication of those matters and include the alternative performance measure in the annual report required under Subsection (b). SECTION 7.14.  Section 74.024(d), Government Code, is amended to read as follows: (d)  Any rules adopted under this section remain in effect unless and until disapproved by the legislature. The clerk of the supreme court shall file with the secretary of state the rules or any amendments to the rules adopted by the supreme court under this section and shall provide [mail] a copy of the rules and any amendments to each registered member of the State Bar not later than the 120th day before the date on which they become effective. The supreme court shall allow a period of 60 days for review and comment on the rules and any amendments. The clerk of the supreme court shall report the rules or amendments to the rules to the next regular session of the legislature by providing [mailing] a copy of the rules or amendments to the rules to each elected member of the legislature on or before December 1 immediately preceding the session. SECTION 7.15.  Section 74.091, Government Code, is amended by amending Subsection (b) and adding Subsection (b-1) to read as follows: (b)  In a county with two or more district courts the judges of those courts shall elect a district judge as local administrative district judge: (1)  for a term of [not more than] two years; or (2)  if the district judge's term ends before the second anniversary of the date the district judge is elected as local administrative judge, for the remainder of the district judge's term. (b-1)  The local administrative district judge may not be elected on the basis of rotation or seniority. SECTION 7.16.  Section 74.092, Government Code, as amended by S.B. 664, Acts of the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, and effective September 1, 2025, is amended by amending Subsection (a) and adding Subsection (c) to read as follows: (a)  A local administrative judge, for the courts for which the judge serves as local administrative judge, shall: (1)  implement and execute the local rules of administration, including the assignment, docketing, transfer, and hearing of cases; (2)  appoint any special or standing committees necessary or desirable for court management and administration; (3)  promulgate local rules of administration if the other judges do not act by a majority vote; (4)  recommend to the regional presiding judge any needs for assignment from outside the county to dispose of court caseloads; (5)  supervise the expeditious movement of court caseloads, subject to local, regional, and state rules of administration; (6)  provide the supreme court and the office of court administration requested statistical and management information; (7)  set the hours and places for holding court in the county; (8)  supervise the employment and performance of nonjudicial personnel; (8-a)  supervise the performance of each master, magistrate, referee, associate judge, or hearing officer who was appointed under Chapter 54 to serve a court for which the judge serves as a local administrative judge and whose duties include duties under Article 15.17, Code of Criminal Procedure; (9)  supervise the budget and fiscal matters of the local courts, subject to local rules of administration; (10)  coordinate and cooperate with any other local administrative judge in the district in the assignment of cases in the courts' concurrent jurisdiction for the efficient operation of the court system and the effective administration of justice; (11)  if requested by the courts the judge serves, establish and maintain the lists required by Section 37.003 and ensure appointments are made from the lists in accordance with Section 37.004; (12)  perform other duties as may be directed by the chief justice or a regional presiding judge; and (13)  establish a court security committee to adopt security policies and procedures for the trial courts served by the local administrative district judge, including by adopting a court emergency management plan, that is composed of: (A)  the local administrative district judge, or the judge's designee, who serves as presiding officer of the committee; (B)  a representative of the sheriff's office; (C)  a representative of a constable's office; (D)  a representative of the county commissioners court; (E) [(D)]  one judge of each type of court in the county, including a justice of the peace and excluding the judge of [other than] a municipal court or a municipal court of record; (F) [(E)]  a representative of any county attorney's office, district attorney's office, or criminal district attorney's office that serves in the applicable courts; and (G) [(F)]  any other person the committee determines necessary to assist the committee. (c)  Notwithstanding Section 551.001 or 552.003, a court security committee established under this section is not a governmental body for the purposes of Chapter 551 or 552. SECTION 7.17.  Section 74.092(b), Government Code, is redesignated as Section 74.0922, Government Code, and amended to read as follows: Sec. 74.0922.  DUTIES OF COURT SECURITY COMMITTEE. [(b)] A court security committee established under Section 74.092(a)(13) shall meet at least once annually and shall develop and submit recommendations [may recommend] to the county commissioners court on the uses of resources and expenditures of money for courthouse security, but may not direct the assignment of those resources or the expenditure of those funds. SECTION 7.18.  Chapter 74, Government Code, is amended by adding Subchapter D-1 to read as follows: SUBCHAPTER D-1. COURT LEADERSHIP CONFERENCE Sec. 74.0981.  COURT LEADERSHIP CONFERENCE. The Office of Court Administration of the Texas Judicial System shall hold an annual leadership conference to provide information to presiding judges of administrative regions, local administrative judges, and court administrators related to: (1)  court budgets and operational funding; (2)  court activity statistics and case-level information on the amount and character of the business transacted by the state trial courts; (3)  the duties of a local administrative judge; and (4)  other matters related to court administration. Sec. 74.0982.  REIMBURSEMENT.  The Office of Court Administration of the Texas Judicial System may reimburse a presiding judge of an administrative region, a local administrative judge, or a court administrator for the expense of attending the leadership conference described by Section 74.0981 to the extent money is appropriated to the office for that purpose. SECTION 7.19.  Section 75.001(d), Government Code, is amended to read as follows: (d)  A retiree who makes an election under this section shall be: (1)  designated a senior judge; and (2)  considered a judge of a court of this state for the purpose of appointment to a judicial branch board, commission, or council. SECTION 7.20.  Section 121.002(c), Government Code, is amended to read as follows: (c)  Notwithstanding any other law, a specialty court program may not operate until the judge, magistrate, or coordinator: (1)  provides to the Office of Court Administration of the Texas Judicial System: (A)  written notice of the program; (B)  any resolution or other official declaration under which the program was established; and (C)  a copy of the program policy manual, participant handbook, or other adopted documentation describing the operational plan of [applicable strategic plan that incorporates duties related to supervision that will be required under] the program; and (2)  receives from the office written verification of the program's compliance with Subdivision (1). SECTION 7.21.  Section 118.011(a), Local Government Code, as amended by S.B. 1547, Acts of the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, is amended to read as follows: (a)  A county clerk shall collect the following fees for services rendered to any person: (1)  Personal Property Records Filing (Sec. 118.012): (A)  for the first page$ 5.00; (B)  for each additional page or part of a page on which there are visible marks of any kind$ 4.00; (2)  Real Property Records Filing (Sec. 118.013): (A)  for the first page$ 5.00; (B)  for each additional page or part of a page on which there are visible marks of any kind$ 4.00; (C)  for all or part of each 8-1/2" X 14" attachment or rider$ 4.00; (D)  for each name in excess  of five names that has to  be indexed in all  records in  which the  document must be indexed $ 0.25; (3)  Certified Papers (Sec. 118.014): (A)  for the clerk's certificate$ 5.00; (B)  printed on paper, plus a fee for each page or part of a page$ 1.00; (C)  that is a paper document converted to electronic format, for each page or part of a page$1; (D)  that is an electronic copy of an electronic document: (i)  for each document up to 10 pages in length$1; (ii)  for each page or part of a page of a document over 10 pages$0.10; (4)  Noncertified Papers (Sec. 118.0145): (A)  printed on paper, for each page or part of a page$ 1.00; (B)  that is a paper document converted to electronic format, for each page or part of a page$1; (C)  that is an electronic copy of an electronic document, except for real property records: (i)  for each document up to 10 pages in length$1; (ii)  for each page or part of a page of a document over 10 pages$0.10; (5)  Birth or Death Certificate (Sec. 118.015)same as state registrar; (6)  Bond Approval (Sec. 118.016)$ 5.00 [3.00]; (7)  Marriage License (Sec. 118.018)$60.00; (8)  Declaration of Informal Marriage (Sec. 118.019)$25.00; (9)  Brand Registration (Sec. 118.020)$ 5.00; (10)  Oath Administration (Sec. 118.021)$ 1.00. SECTION 7.22.  Section 135.101(a), Local Government Code, is amended to read as follows: (a)  A person shall pay in a district court, statutory county court, or county court in addition to all other fees and court costs a local consolidated filing fee of: (1)  $213 on filing any civil case except a probate, guardianship, or mental health case; and (2)  $35 on any action other than an original action for a case subject to Subdivision (1), including [an appeal and] any counterclaim, cross-action, intervention, contempt action, interpleader, motion for new trial, motion to reinstate, or third-party action. SECTION 7.23.  (a) In this section: (1)  "Digital court recording" means the act of making a verbatim record of an oral court proceeding, deposition, or proceeding before a grand jury, referee, or court commissioner for use in litigation in the courts of this state through the use of digital technology, electronic recording equipment, or other recording and transcribing technology. (2)  "Office" means the Office of Court Administration of the Texas Judicial System. (3)  "Official court reporter" and "shorthand reporter" have the meanings assigned by Section 154.001, Government Code. (b)  The office shall conduct a study on digital court recording, including: (1)  an evaluation of the current use of digital court recording in the courts of this state, including the cost, access, accuracy, and effectiveness of digital court recording; (2)  an analysis of the use of digital court recording in other states and jurisdictions; and (3)  recommendations on any necessary changes to statutes, rules, regulations, or standards regarding the use of digital court recording in this state. (c)  The office shall establish a workgroup of stakeholders to provide information to the office related to the study conducted under this section.  The workgroup must include representatives of each of the following groups: (1)  judges of courts of record; (2)  organizations of shorthand reporters who serve as official court reporters; (3)  organizations of shorthand reporters who specialize in reporting depositions; (4)  individuals who provide digital court recording services; (5)  attorneys who use shorthand reporting and digital court recording services; and (6)  the public. (d)  Nothing in this section may be construed to limit: (1)  the methods the office may use to gather and evaluate information related to the study conducted under this section; or (2)  the ability of the office to employ individuals or enter into contracts for assistance with conducting the study. (e)  Not later than October 1, 2026, the office shall submit a report on the study conducted under this section to the governor, lieutenant governor, speaker of the house of representatives, and appropriate standing committees of the legislature. (f)  This section expires September 1, 2027. ARTICLE 8.  COPIES CERTIFIED BY CLERKS SECTION 8.01.  Subchapter D, Chapter 51, Government Code, is amended by adding Section 51.3033 to read as follows: Sec. 51.3033.  CERTIFIED COPIES. A certified copy made of an original document on file in a district clerk's office must include: (1)  on each page of the copy: (A)  the clerk's signature or initials; (B)  the district court seal; or (C)  a unique document certification and paginated page number; and (2)  on the final page of the copy: (A)  the clerk's attestation certifying that the copy is a true and correct copy of the original document filed in the clerk's office; (B)  the number of pages copied; and (C)  the date the copy was issued. SECTION 8.02.  Subchapter F, Chapter 51, Government Code, is amended by adding Section 51.503 to read as follows: Sec. 51.503.  CERTIFIED COPIES. A certified copy made of an original document on file in a joint clerk's office must include: (1)  on each page of the copy: (A)  the clerk's signature or initials; (B)  the applicable court's seal; or (C)  a unique document certification and paginated page number; and (2)  on the final page of the copy: (A)  the clerk's attestation certifying that the copy is a true and correct copy of the original document filed in the clerk's office; (B)  the number of pages copied; and (C)  the date the copy was issued. SECTION 8.03.  Chapter 191, Local Government Code, is amended by adding Section 191.0041 to read as follows: Sec. 191.0041.  CERTIFIED COPIES. A certified copy made of an original document on file in a county clerk's office must include: (1)  on each page of the copy: (A)  either: (i)  the clerk's signature or initials; or (ii)  a unique document certification and paginated page number; and (B)  either: (i)  the commissioners court seal on a copy of a document that is not a court document; or (ii)  the court seal on a copy of a court document; and (2)  on the final page of the copy: (A)  the clerk's attestation certifying that the copy is a true and correct copy of the original document filed in the clerk's office; (B)  the number of pages copied; and (C)  the date the copy was issued. ARTICLE 9. CIVIL, CRIMINAL, AND APPELLATE COURT PROCEDURES SECTION 9.01.  Section 16.073, Civil Practice and Remedies Code, is amended to read as follows: Sec. 16.073.  APPLICABILITY OF LIMITATIONS PERIODS TO ARBITRATION.  A claim that is sought to be arbitrated is subject to the same limitations period that would apply to the claim if the claim had been brought in court. Commencing an action asserting a claim by filing suit in a court of competent jurisdiction will toll the applicable limitations period for arbitration of the same claim. [(a)  A party may not assert a claim in an arbitration proceeding if the party could not bring suit for the claim in court due to the expiration of the applicable limitations period. [(b)  A party may assert a claim in an arbitration proceeding after expiration of the applicable limitations period if: [(1)  the party brought suit for the claim in court before the expiration of the applicable limitations period; and [(2)  the parties to the claim agreed to arbitrate the claim or a court ordered the parties to arbitrate the claim.] SECTION 9.02.  Section 30.015(a), Civil Practice and Remedies Code, as amended by H.B. 40, Acts of the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, and effective September 1, 2025, is amended to read as follows: (a)  In a civil action filed in a district court, a county court, a statutory county court, a statutory probate court, or the business court, each party or the party's attorney must provide the clerk of the court with written notice of the party's name, the party's [and] current residence or business address, and for a party who is an individual: (1)  the last three digits of the party's social security number; or (2)  the last three digits of the party's Texas driver's license. SECTION 9.03.  Section 30.015(b), Civil Practice and Remedies Code, is amended to read as follows: (b)  Unless the party is the defendant in a tax suit, the [The] notice required by Subsection (a) may not be required from any party or party's attorney if the [such] party has not appeared or answered in the civil action. SECTION 9.04.  (a) Article 17.292(n), Code of Criminal Procedure, is amended to read as follows: (n)  On request [motion, notice, and hearing, or on agreement of the parties], all or part of an order for emergency protection issued under this article may be modified by [transferred to] the court that assumed [assuming] jurisdiction over the offense [criminal act] giving rise to the issuance of the [emergency] order [for protection]. The standards under Subsection (j) are applicable to a [On transfer, the criminal] court modifying [may modify] all or part of an order [issued] under this subsection [in the same manner and under the same standards as the issuing court under Subsection (j)]. (b)  Article 17.292(n), Code of Criminal Procedure, as amended by this article, applies only to a magistrate's order for emergency protection entered on or after the effective date of this Act. A magistrate's order for emergency protection entered before the effective date of this Act is governed by the law in effect on the date the order was entered, and the former law is continued in effect for that purpose. SECTION 9.05.  (a) Articles 43.09(a) and (k), Code of Criminal Procedure, are amended to read as follows: (a)  When a defendant is convicted of a misdemeanor and the defendant's punishment is assessed at a pecuniary fine or is confined in a jail after conviction of a felony for which a fine is imposed, if the defendant is unable to pay the fine and costs adjudged against the defendant, the defendant may for such time as will satisfy the judgment be put to work in the county jail industries program, in the workhouse, or on the county farm, or public improvements and maintenance projects of the county or a political subdivision located in whole or in part in the county, as provided in Article 43.10; or if there is no such county jail industries program, workhouse, farm, or improvements and maintenance projects, the defendant shall be confined in jail for a sufficient length of time to discharge the full amount of fine and costs adjudged against the defendant; rating such confinement at $150 [$100] for each day and rating such labor at $150 [$100] for each day; provided, however, that the defendant may pay the pecuniary fine assessed against the defendant at any time while the defendant is serving at work in the county jail industries program, in the workhouse, or on the county farm, or on the public improvements and maintenance projects of the county or a political subdivision located in whole or in part in the county, or while the defendant is serving the defendant's jail sentence, and in such instances the defendant is entitled to the credit earned under this subsection during the time that the defendant has served and the defendant shall only be required to pay the balance of the pecuniary fine assessed against the defendant.  A defendant who performs labor under this article during a day in which the defendant is confined is entitled to both the credit for confinement and the credit for labor provided by this article. (k)  A defendant is considered to have discharged $150 [$100] of fines or costs for each eight hours of community service performed under Subsection (f) of this article. (b)  Article 43.09(a), Code of Criminal Procedure, as amended by this article, applies to a defendant who is confined or performs labor to discharge fines or costs on or after the effective date of this Act, regardless of whether the offense for which the fines or costs were imposed occurred before, on, or after that date. SECTION 9.06.  (a) Article 45A.251(e), Code of Criminal Procedure, is amended to read as follows: (e)  In addition to credit under Subsection (d), in imposing a fine and costs in a case involving a misdemeanor punishable by fine only, the justice or judge shall credit the defendant for any period the defendant was confined in jail or prison while awaiting trial or serving a sentence for another offense if that confinement occurred after the commission of the misdemeanor.  The credit under this subsection shall be applied to the amount of the fine and costs at the rate of not less than $150 for each day of confinement. (b)  Article 45A.251(e), Code of Criminal Procedure, as amended by this article, applies to a defendant who is sentenced for an offense on or after the effective date of this Act, regardless of whether the offense was committed before, on, or after that date. SECTION 9.07.  Article 45A.254(e), Code of Criminal Procedure, is amended to read as follows: (e)  A defendant is considered to have discharged not less than $150 [$100] of fines or costs for each eight hours of community service performed under this article. SECTION 9.08.  Article 45A.459(i), Code of Criminal Procedure, is amended to read as follows: (i)  A defendant is considered to have discharged not less than $150 [$100] of fines or costs for each eight hours of community service performed under this article. SECTION 9.09.  Article 45A.460(i), Code of Criminal Procedure, is amended to read as follows: (i)  A defendant is considered to have discharged not less than $150 [$100] of fines or costs for each eight hours of community service performed under this article. SECTION 9.10.  (a) Subchapter A, Chapter 102, Code of Criminal Procedure, is amended by adding Article 102.006 to read as follows: Art. 102.006.  FEES IN EXPUNCTION PROCEEDINGS. (a) In addition to any other fees required by other law and except as provided by Subsections (b) and (b-1), a petitioner seeking expunction of a criminal record in a district court shall pay the following fees: (1)  the fee charged for filing an ex parte petition in a civil action in district court; (2)  $1 plus postage for each certified mailing of notice of the hearing date; and (3)  $2 plus postage for each certified mailing of certified copies of an order of expunction. (a-1)  In addition to any other fees required by other law and except as provided by Subsection (b), a petitioner seeking expunction of a criminal record in a justice court or a municipal court of record under Chapter 55A shall pay a fee of $100 for filing an ex parte petition for expunction to defray the cost of notifying state agencies of orders of expunction under that chapter. (b)  The fees under Subsection (a) or the fee under Subsection (a-1), as applicable, shall be waived if the petitioner seeks expunction of a criminal record that relates to an arrest for an offense of which the person was acquitted, other than an acquittal for an offense described by Article 55A.151, and the petition for expunction is filed not later than the 30th day after the date of the acquittal. (b-1)  The fees under Subsection (a) shall be waived if the petitioner is entitled to expunction: (1)  under Article 55A.053(a)(2)(A) after successful completion of a veterans treatment court program created under Chapter 124, Government Code, or former law; or (2)  under Article 55A.053(a)(2)(B) after successful completion of a mental health court program created under Chapter 125, Government Code, or former law. (c)  A court that grants a petition for expunction of a criminal record may order that any fee, or portion of a fee, required to be paid under Subsection (a) be returned to the petitioner. (d)  This section expires January 1, 2026. (b)  This section takes effect immediately if this Act receives a vote of two-thirds of all the members elected to each house, as provided by Section 39, Article III, Texas Constitution. If this Act does not receive the vote necessary for immediate effect, this section takes effect on the effective date of this Act. SECTION 9.11.  Section 233.006(b), Election Code, is amended to read as follows: (b)  Except as provided by Section 30.023, Civil Practice and Remedies Code [233.014], the contestant must file the petition not later than the later of the 30th day after the date the election records are publicly available under Section 1.012 or the official result of the contested election is determined. SECTION 9.12.  (a) Section 233.014, Election Code, is transferred to Chapter 30, Civil Practice and Remedies Code, redesignated as Section 30.023, Civil Practice and Remedies Code, and amended to read as follows: Sec. 30.023 [233.014].  SPECIAL PROCEDURES FOR CONTEST OF CONSTITUTIONAL AMENDMENT ELECTION. (a) This section applies only to a contest of an election on a proposed constitutional amendment. (b)  The contestant's petition must be filed and service of citation on the secretary of state must be obtained before the final official canvass is completed. (c)  The filing of an election contest does not suspend implementation of a constitutional amendment approved by the majority of the votes cast [The declaration of the official result of a contested election may not be made until the contest is finally determined. The secretary of state shall tabulate the county returns and the governor shall announce the final vote count, as ascertained from the returns, in a written document. The document announcing the final vote count must state that a contest of the election has been filed and that the declaration of the official result will not be made until the contest is finally determined]. (c-1)  The trial court must ensure a written ruling on a pretrial motion before the court is entered not later than the 30th day after the date the motion is filed. (d)  The trial date may not be earlier than the 45th day after the date of the contested election except [nor later than the 180th day after the date of the contested election. The trial date may be earlier than the 45th day after the date of the contested election] at the request of the contestant. The trial court must ensure the judgment of the court is not filed later than the 180th day after the date of the contested election. (e)  If an amended petition alleging additional grounds of contest is filed, the contest may not be called for trial earlier than the 20th day after the date the amended petition is filed unless the secretary of state agrees to calling the contest for trial at an earlier date. (f)  The court shall include in its judgment in a contest an order directing the governor to declare the [official result of the election or to declare the] election valid or void, as appropriate, not later than the 10th day after the date the judgment becomes final. (g)  Any question relating to the validity or outcome of a constitutional amendment election may be raised in an election contest.  A contest is the exclusive method for adjudicating such questions. (h)  If a contestant files an appeal of the contest, the appellate court must ensure that the action is brought to final disposition not later than the 60th [180th] day after the date the judgment becomes final. (b)  Section 233.014, Election Code, as redesignated and amended by this article, applies to a contest of a constitutional amendment election filed on or after the effective date of this Act. A contest of a constitutional amendment election filed before that date is governed by the law in effect on the date that the suit is filed, and the former law is continued in effect for that purpose. SECTION 9.13.  Section 6.4035(e), Family Code, is amended to read as follows: (e)  The party executing the waiver may [not] sign the waiver using a digitized signature. SECTION 9.14.  (a) Section 22.220, Government Code, is amended by adding Subsection (e) to read as follows: (e)  A party may not file a notice of appeal in a civil case requesting assignment of the appeal to the Court of Appeals for the Fifteenth Court of Appeals District unless the notice includes a matter arising out of or related to the case that is within the court's exclusive intermediate appellate jurisdiction. (b)  Section 22.220(e), Government Code, as added by this article, applies only to a notice of appeal filed on or after the effective date of this Act. A notice of appeal filed before that date is governed by the law in effect on the date the notice was filed, and the former law is continued in effect for that purpose. SECTION 9.15.  (a) Section 23.303, Government Code, as added by S.B. 293, Acts of the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, and effective September 1, 2025, is amended by amending Subsections (a) and (b) and adding Subsection (b-1) to read as follows: (a)  The business court, a district court, or a statutory county court shall, with respect to a motion for summary judgment: (1)  set the motion for a hearing by [hear] oral argument [on the motion] or by submission on a date [consider the motion without oral argument] not later than: (A)  the 60th [45th] day after the date [the response to] the motion was filed; or (B)  the 90th day after the date the motion was filed: (i)  if the court's docket requires a hearing on a date later than the 60th day after the date the motion was filed; (ii)  on a showing of good cause; or (iii)  if the movant consents; and (2)  file with the clerk of the court and provide to the parties a written ruling on the motion not later than the 90th day after the date the motion was heard [argued] or considered. (b)  The [If a motion for summary judgment is considered by a court described by Subsection (a) without oral argument, the] court shall record in the docket the date the motion was heard or considered [without argument]. (b-1)  Subsections (a) and (b) do not apply to a motion for summary judgment that is withdrawn. (b)  Section 23.303, Government Code, as amended by this section, applies only to a motion for summary judgment filed on or after the effective date of this Act. A motion for summary judgment filed before the effective date of this Act is governed by the law in effect on the date the motion was filed, and that law is continued in effect for that purpose. SECTION 9.16.  Section 406.026, Government Code, is amended to read as follows: Sec. 406.026.  ELECTRONIC NOTARIZATION. In a proceeding filed under Title 1 or 5, Family Code, if a signature is required to be notarized, acknowledged, verified, or made under oath, the requirement may be satisfied if the electronic signature of the person authorized to perform that act, together with all other information required to be included by other applicable law, is attached to or logically associated with the signature required to be notarized, acknowledged, verified, or made under oath. SECTION 9.17.  Section 21.049, Property Code, is amended to read as follows: Sec. 21.049.  NOTICE OF DECISION OF SPECIAL COMMISSIONERS. The judge of a court hearing a proceeding under this chapter shall inform the clerk of the court as to a decision by the special commissioners on the day the decision is filed or on the next working day after the day the decision is filed. Not later than the next working day after the day the decision is filed, the clerk shall send notice of the decision by a delivery method described under Rule 21a, Texas Rules of Civil Procedure [certified or registered United States mail, return receipt requested], to the parties in the proceeding, or to their attorneys of record, at their addresses of record. SECTION 9.18.  Section 34.03(a), Tax Code, is amended to read as follows: (a)  The clerk of the court shall: (1)  if the amount of excess proceeds is more than $25, before the 31st day after the date the excess proceeds are received by the clerk, send by a delivery method described by Rule 21a, Texas Rules of Civil Procedure [certified mail, return receipt requested], a written notice to the former owner of the property, at the former owner's last known address according to the records of the court or any other source reasonably available to the court, that: (A)  states the amount of the excess proceeds; (B)  informs the former owner of that owner's rights to claim the excess proceeds under Section 34.04; and (C)  includes a copy or the complete text of this section and Section 34.04; (2)  regardless of the amount, keep the excess proceeds paid into court as provided by Section 34.02(d) for a period of two years after the date of the sale unless otherwise ordered by the court; and (3)  regardless of the amount, send to the attorney general notice of the deposit and amount of excess proceeds if the attorney general or a state agency represented by the attorney general is named as an in rem defendant in the underlying suit for seizure of the property or foreclosure of a tax lien on the property. SECTION 9.19.  Section 521.243(a), Transportation Code, is amended to read as follows: (a)  Unless the petition is dismissed under Section 521.2421(f), the clerk of the court shall send electronically or by a delivery method described by Rule 21a, Texas Rules of Civil Procedure, [by certified mail] to the attorney representing the state a copy of the petition and notice of the hearing if the petitioner's license was suspended, revoked, or canceled following a conviction for: (1)  an offense under Section 19.05 or Sections 49.04-49.08, Penal Code; or (2)  an offense to which Section 521.342 applies. SECTION 9.20.  The changes in law made by this article to Articles 43.09(k), 45A.254(e), 45A.459(i), and 45A.460(i), Code of Criminal Procedure, apply to a defendant who performs community service to discharge fines or costs on or after the effective date of this Act, regardless of whether the offense for which the fines or costs were imposed occurred before, on, or after that date. SECTION 9.21.  Section 6.4035(e), Family Code, and Section 406.026, Government Code, as amended by this article, apply to a waiver of citation executed in a suit for dissolution of a marriage that is pending in a trial court on the effective date of this Act, or that is filed on or after that date. SECTION 9.22.  (a) Notwithstanding Section 19, S.B. 1760, Acts of the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, Section 1023.0071, Estates Code, as added by Section 5, S.B. 1760, Acts of the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, takes effect January 1, 2026. (b)  This section takes effect immediately if this Act receives a vote of two-thirds of all the members elected to each house, as provided by Section 39, Article III, Texas Constitution. If this Act does not receive the vote necessary for immediate effect, this section takes effect on the effective date of this Act. ARTICLE 10. YOUTH DIVERSION SECTION 10.01.  Article 45A.253(b), Code of Criminal Procedure, as amended by H.B. 1620, Acts of the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, and effective September 1, 2025, is amended to read as follows: (b)  If a diversion is not required under Subchapter K [or Article 45A.251(a-1)], a judge shall allow a defendant who is a child, as defined by Article 45A.453(a), to elect at the time of conviction, as defined by Section 133.101, Local Government Code, to discharge the fine and costs by: (1)  performing community service or receiving tutoring under Article 45A.460, regardless of whether the applicable offense occurred at a location specified by Subsection (a) of that article; or (2)  paying the fine and costs in a manner described by Article 45A.251(b). SECTION 10.02.  Article 45A.501, Code of Criminal Procedure, as added by H.B. 1620, Acts of the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, and effective September 1, 2025, is amended by adding Subdivision (8-a) to read as follows: (8-a)  "Traffic offense" has the meaning assigned by Section 51.02, Family Code. SECTION 10.03.  Article 45A.504, Code of Criminal Procedure, as added by H.B. 1620, Acts of the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, and effective September 1, 2025, is amended by amending Subsection (b) and adding Subsection (b-1) to read as follows: (b)  A child is eligible to enter into a diversion agreement under this subchapter only once every 12 months [365 days]. (b-1)  A child is eligible to enter into a diversion agreement under this subchapter for more than one offense if the offenses are alleged to have occurred as part of the same criminal episode, as defined by Section 3.01, Penal Code. SECTION 10.04.  Article 45A.510(a), Code of Criminal Procedure, as added by H.B. 1620, Acts of the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, and effective September 1, 2025, is amended to read as follows: (a)  If a charge involving a child who is eligible for diversion is filed with a court, and [a justice or judge shall divert the case under this article as follows: [(1)  if] the child does not contest the charge, a justice or judge shall divert the case under this article without the child having to enter a plea[; or [(2)  if the child contests the charge, a justice or judge shall divert the case under this article at the conclusion of trial on a finding of guilt without entering a judgment of conviction as provided by Article 45A.251]. SECTION 10.05.  Article 45A.512(a), Code of Criminal Procedure, as added by H.B. 1620, Acts of the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, and effective September 1, 2025, is amended to read as follows: (a)  The clerk of a justice or municipal court may collect from a child's parent an [a $50] administrative fee not to exceed $50 to defray the costs of the diversion of the child's case under this subchapter. SECTION 10.06.  Section 53.01(b-1), Family Code, is amended to read as follows: (b-1)  The person who is conducting the preliminary investigation shall, as appropriate, refer the child's case to a community resource coordination group, a local-level interagency staffing group, or other community juvenile service provider for services under Section 53.011, if the person determines that: (1)  [the child is younger than 12 years of age; [(2)]  there is probable cause to believe the child engaged in delinquent conduct or conduct indicating a need for supervision; (2) [(3)]  the child's case does not require referral to the prosecuting attorney under Subsection (d) or (f); (3) [(4)]  the child is eligible for deferred prosecution under Section 53.03; and (4) [(5)]  the child: (A)  is younger than 12 years of age, and the child  and the child's family are not currently receiving services under Section 53.011 and would benefit from receiving the services; or (B)  resides in a general residential operation, as that term is defined by Section 42.002, Human Resources Code. SECTION 10.07.  Section 82.004, Family Code, is amended to read as follows: Sec. 82.004.  FORM AND CONTENT OF APPLICATION.  (a) A person filing an application under this chapter shall use the protective order application form created by the Office of Court Administration of the Texas Judicial System under Section 72.039, Government Code, that is available on the office's Internet website, and shall include in the application: (1)  the name [and county of residence] of each applicant; (2)  the county of residence of each applicant, unless the applicant requests confidentiality pursuant to Section 82.011 or 85.007; (3)  the name and county of residence of each individual alleged to have committed family violence; (4) [(3)]  the relationships between the applicants and the individual alleged to have committed family violence; (5) [(4)]  a request for one or more protective orders; [and] (6) [(5)]  whether an applicant is receiving services from the Title IV-D agency in connection with a child support case and, if known, the agency case number for each open case; and (7)  any additional information known by the applicant that may assist in finding the respondent for the purposes of services. (b)  An applicant may submit an affidavit of confidentiality to the court pursuant to Section 72.039, Government Code, or Section 82.011 or 85.007, Family Code, to omit confidential information from the application and any subsequent protective order. An affidavit of confidentiality is only for the court's use and shall not be transmitted to the respondent. (c)  A party's failure to use the standardized protective order form as required under Subsection (a) does not affect the validity or enforceability of the application or any subsequent protective order issued. SECTION 10.08.  Section 42.0426(b), Human Resources Code, is amended to read as follows: (b)  A residential child-care facility shall implement a behavior intervention program approved by the department for the benefit of a child served by the facility who needs assistance in managing the child's conduct.  The program must include: (1)  behavior intervention instruction for staff members who work directly with children served by the facility, including crisis response training for emergency behavior intervention with a goal of limiting law enforcement involvement; and (2)  training for all employees regarding the risks associated with the use of prone restraints. SECTION 10.09.  Section 152.00145, Human Resources Code, is amended to read as follows: Sec. 152.00145.  DIVERSION AND DETENTION POLICY FOR CERTAIN JUVENILES. (a) In this section, "general residential operation" has the meaning assigned by Section 42.002. (b)  A juvenile board shall establish policies that prioritize: (1)  the diversion from referral to a prosecuting attorney under Chapter 53, Family Code, of children who are: (A)  younger than 12 years of age [from referral to a prosecuting attorney under Chapter 53, Family Code]; or (B)  residing in a general residential operation, particularly children alleged to have engaged in conduct constituting a misdemeanor involving violence to a person; and (2)  the limitation of detention, to circumstances of last resort, of children who are: (A)  younger than 12 years of age; or (B)  residing in a general residential operation [to circumstances of last resort]. (c)  To monitor the success of policies implemented under Subsection (b) for children who reside in general residential operations, a juvenile board shall track: (1)  the number of children referred to the board who reside in a general residential operation; (2)  the number of children described by Subdivision (1) who receive deferred prosecution or are referred to the juvenile probation department; and (3)  the general residential operation where a child described by Subdivision (1) resides. SECTION 10.10.  Article 45A.251(a-1), Code of Criminal Procedure, as added by H.B. 1620, Acts of the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, and effective September 1, 2025, is repealed. SECTION 10.11.  Section 53.01(b-1), Family Code, as amended by this article, applies only to conduct that occurs on or after the effective date of this Act.  Conduct that occurs before that date is governed by the law in effect on the date the conduct occurred, and the former law is continued in effect for that purpose.  For the purposes of this section, conduct occurred before the effective date of this Act if any element of the conduct occurred before that date. ARTICLE 11A. COURT-ORDERED MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES SECTION 11A.01.  The following SECTIONS of S.B. 1164, Acts of the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, as effective September 1, 2025, are repealed: (1)  SECTION 8, which amends Sections 574.011(a) and (b), Health and Safety Code; (2)  SECTION 9, which amends Sections 574.034(a) and (d), Health and Safety Code; and (3)  SECTION 10, which amends Sections 574.035(a) and (e), Health and Safety Code. SECTION 11A.02.  (a) This article takes effect only if the 2nd Called Session of the 89th Legislature, 2025, ends before September 1, 2025. If the 2nd Called Session of the 89th Legislature, 2025, ends on or after September 1, 2025, this article has no effect. (b)  Subject to Subsection (a) of this section, this article takes effect immediately if it receives a vote of two-thirds of all the members elected to each house, as provided by Section 39, Article III, Texas Constitution. If this article does not receive the vote necessary for immediate effect, this article has no effect. ARTICLE 11B. COURT-ORDERED MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES SECTION 11B.01.  Sections 574.011(a) and (b), Health and Safety Code, as amended by S.B. 1164, Acts of the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, and effective September 1, 2025, are amended to read as follows: (a)  A certificate of medical examination for mental illness must be sworn to, dated, and signed by the examining physician.  The certificate must include: (1)  the name and address of the examining physician; (2)  the name and address of the person examined; (3)  the date and place of the examination; (4)  a brief diagnosis of the examined person's physical and mental condition; (5)  the period, if any, during which the examined person has been under the care of the examining physician; (6)  an accurate description of the mental health treatment, if any, given by or administered under the direction of the examining physician; and (7)  the examining physician's opinion that: (A)  the examined person is a person with mental illness; and (B)  as a result of that illness the examined person is[: [(i)]  likely to cause serious harm to the person or to others or is: (i)  [; [(ii)]  suffering severe and abnormal mental, emotional, or physical distress; (ii) [(iii)]  experiencing substantial mental or physical deterioration of the proposed patient's ability to function independently, which is exhibited by the proposed patient's inability, except for reasons of indigence, to provide for the proposed patient's basic needs, including food, clothing, health, or safety; and (iii) [(iv)]  not able to make a rational and informed decision as to whether to submit to treatment[; or [(v)  evidencing an inability to recognize symptoms or appreciate the risks and benefits of treatment; and [(B)  in the absence of inpatient mental health treatment, the examined person is likely to suffer serious risk of harm or to inflict serious harm on another person]. (b)  The examining physician must specify in the certificate which criterion listed in Subsection (a)(7)(B) [(a)(7)] forms the basis for the physician's opinion. SECTION 11B.02.  Sections 574.034(a) and (d), Health and Safety Code, as amended by S.B. 1164, Acts of the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, and effective September 1, 2025, are amended to read as follows: (a)  The judge may order a proposed patient to receive court-ordered temporary inpatient mental health services only if the judge or jury finds, from clear and convincing evidence, that: (1)  the proposed patient is a person with mental illness; and (2)  as a result of that mental illness the proposed patient: (A)  is likely to cause serious harm to the proposed patient; (B)  is likely to cause serious harm to others; or (C)  is: (i)  suffering severe and abnormal mental, emotional, or physical distress; (ii)  experiencing substantial mental or physical deterioration of the proposed patient's ability to function independently, which is exhibited by the proposed patient's inability, except for reasons of indigence, to provide for the proposed patient's basic needs, including food, clothing, health, or safety; and (iii)  unable to make a rational and informed decision as to whether or not to submit to treatment[; or [(iv)  evidencing an inability to recognize symptoms or to appreciate the risks and benefits of treatment; and [(D)  in the absence of court-ordered temporary inpatient mental health services, is likely to suffer serious risk of harm or to inflict serious harm on another person]. (d)  To be clear and convincing under Subsection (a), the evidence must include expert testimony and, unless waived, evidence of a recent overt act or a continuing pattern of behavior that tends to confirm: (1)  the likelihood of serious harm to the proposed patient or others; or (2)  [and] the proposed patient's distress and the deterioration of the proposed patient's ability to function[; or [(2)  the proposed patient's inability to recognize symptoms or appreciate the risks and benefits of treatment]. SECTION 11B.03.  Sections 574.035(a) and (e), Health and Safety Code, as amended by S.B. 1164, Acts of the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, and effective September 1, 2025, are amended to read as follows: (a)  The judge may order a proposed patient to receive court-ordered extended inpatient mental health services only if the jury, or the judge if the right to a jury is waived, finds, from clear and convincing evidence, that: (1)  the proposed patient is a person with mental illness; (2)  as a result of that mental illness the proposed patient: (A)  is likely to cause serious harm to the proposed patient; (B)  is likely to cause serious harm to others; or (C)  is: (i)  suffering severe and abnormal mental, emotional, or physical distress; (ii)  experiencing substantial mental or physical deterioration of the proposed patient's ability to function independently, which is exhibited by the proposed patient's inability, except for reasons of indigence, to provide for the proposed patient's basic needs, including food, clothing, health, or safety; and (iii)  unable to make a rational and informed decision as to whether or not to submit to treatment; [or [(iv)  evidencing an inability to recognize symptoms or appreciate the risks and benefits of treatment; and [(D)  in the absence of court-ordered extended inpatient mental health services, is likely to suffer serious risk of harm or to inflict serious harm on another person;] (3)  the proposed patient's condition is expected to continue for more than 90 days; and (4)  the proposed patient has received court-ordered inpatient mental health services under this subtitle or under Chapter 46B, Code of Criminal Procedure, for at least 60 consecutive days during the preceding 12 months. (e)  To be clear and convincing under Subsection (a), the evidence must include expert testimony and evidence of a recent overt act or a continuing pattern of behavior that tends to confirm: (1)  the likelihood of serious harm to the proposed patient or others; or (2)  [and] the proposed patient's distress and the deterioration of the proposed patient's ability to function[; or [(2)  the proposed patient's inability to recognize symptoms or appreciate the risks and benefits of treatment]. SECTION 11B.04.  Chapter 574, Health and Safety Code, as amended by this article, applies only to an application or proceeding for court-ordered mental health services submitted or that occurs on or after the effective date of this Act, regardless of when an offense with which the defendant is charged was committed. SECTION 11B.05.  (a)  This article takes effect only if Article 11A of this Act does not become law.  If Article 11A of this Act becomes law, this article has no effect. (b)  Subject to Subsection (a) of this section, this article takes effect immediately if it receives a vote of two-thirds of all the members elected to each house, as provided by Section 39, Article III, Texas Constitution. If this article does not receive the vote necessary for immediate effect, this article takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session. ARTICLE 12. POWERS OF THE SUPREME COURT SECTION 12.01.  Section 22.004, Government Code, is amended by amending Subsection (c) and adding Subsections (c-1) and (c-2) to read as follows: (c)  To ensure [So that] the supreme court has full rulemaking power in civil actions, [a rule adopted by the supreme court repeals] all [conflicting] laws and parts of laws governing practice and procedure in civil actions enacted before May 15, 1939, are repealed, subject to Subsection (c-1)[, but substantive law is not repealed]. This subsection does not repeal a substantive law. (c-1)  A law or part of a law described by Subsection (c) is not superseded until the supreme court adopts a rule that governs the subject matter of the law or part of a law. (c-2)  At the time the supreme court files a rule, the court shall file with the secretary of state a list of each article or section of general law or each part of an article or section of general law that is superseded under Subsection (c-1) [is repealed or modified in any way]. The list has the same weight and effect as a decision of the court. SECTION 12.02.  Section 30.0035, Civil Practice and Remedies Code, is amended to read as follows: Sec. 30.0035.  PERSONAL SERVICE OF PROCESS DURING LEGISLATIVE PROCEEDING PROHIBITED. A person may not serve citation or other civil process in person on a member, officer, or employee of the senate or house of representatives during any legislative proceeding. A court shall quash any service made in violation of this section. The supreme court shall revoke the certification of a process server who violates this section. [This section is not subject to Section 22.004(c), Government Code.] SECTION 12.03.  Section 34.041(c), Civil Practice and Remedies Code, is amended to read as follows: (c)  A sale of real property under this subchapter must take place between 10 a.m. and 4 p.m. on the first Tuesday of a month or, if the first Tuesday of a month occurs on January 1 or July 4, between 10 a.m. and 4 p.m. on the first Wednesday of the month. [Notwithstanding Section 22.004, Government Code, the supreme court may not amend or adopt rules in conflict with this subsection.] SECTION 12.04.  Section 1162.007(c), Estates Code, is amended to read as follows: (c)  An attorney does not violate the attorney-client privilege solely by complying with a court order to release an instrument subject to this section and Sections 1162.005 and 1162.006.  [Notwithstanding Section 22.004, Government Code, the supreme court may not amend or adopt rules in conflict with this subsection.] SECTION 12.05.  Section 52.047(g), Government Code, is amended to read as follows: (g)  Notwithstanding the Texas Rules of Appellate Procedure, an official court reporter who is required to prepare a transcript in a criminal case without charging a fee is not entitled to payment for the transcript from the state or county if the county paid a substitute court reporter to perform the official court reporter's regular duties while the transcript was being prepared. To the extent that this subsection conflicts with the Texas Rules of Appellate Procedure, this subsection controls.  [Notwithstanding Sections 22.004 and 22.108(b), the supreme court or the court of criminal appeals may not amend or adopt rules in conflict with this subsection.] SECTION 12.06.  Section 2273.004(c), Government Code, as added by S.B. 33, Acts of the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, and effective September 1, 2025, is amended to read as follows: (c)  Notwithstanding any other law: (1)  a court may not award costs or attorney's fees under Rule 91a, Texas Rules of Civil Procedure, [or under another rule the supreme court adopts under Section 22.004(g)] to any defendant against whom an action is brought under this section; and (2)  Chapters 27 and 110, Civil Practice and Remedies Code, do not apply to an action brought under this section. SECTION 12.07.  Section 171.208(i), Health and Safety Code, is amended to read as follows: (i)  Notwithstanding any other law, a court may not award costs or attorney's fees under the Texas Rules of Civil Procedure [or any other rule adopted by the supreme court under Section 22.004, Government Code,] to a defendant in an action brought under this section. SECTION 12.08.  Section 455.351(h), Occupations Code, is amended to read as follows: (h)  Notwithstanding any other law or rule [Section 22.004, Government Code]: (1)  a person may not continue the enjoined activity pending appeal or trial on the merits of an injunctive order entered in a suit brought under this subchapter; (2)  not later than the 90th day after the date of the injunctive order, the appropriate court of appeals shall hear and decide an appeal taken by a party enjoined under this subchapter; and (3)  if an appeal is not taken by a party temporarily enjoined under this subchapter [article], the parties are entitled to a full trial on the merits not later than the 90th day after the date of the temporary injunctive order. SECTION 12.09.  Effective January 1, 2026, Section 24.0043(a), Property Code, as added by S.B. 38, Acts of the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, and effective January 1, 2026, is amended to read as follows: (a)  Except as provided by Subsection (b) but notwithstanding any other law, [including Section 22.004, Government Code,] only the legislature may modify or suspend procedures prescribed by this chapter. SECTION 12.10.  The following provisions of the Civil Practice and Remedies Code are repealed: (1)  Section 10.006; (2)  Section 14.013(c); (3)  Section 14.014; (4)  Section 14A.061(c); (5)  Section 14A.062; (6)  Section 15.066; (7)  Section 30.010(d); (8)  Section 30.013(f); (9)  Section 30.018(b); (10)  Section 51.017(b); (11)  Section 52.005(b); (12)  Section 64.091(k); (13)  Section 64.093(k); (14)  Section 65.045(b); (15)  Section 98.007(e); (16)  Section 98B.008(e), as added by S.B. 441, Acts of the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, and effective September 1, 2025; (17)  Section 100B.004(e), as added by S.B. 2373, Acts of the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, and effective September 1, 2025; (18)  Section 134A.0065(k), as added by H.B. 4081, Acts of the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, and effective September 1, 2025; (19)  Section 134A.007(c); and (20)  Section 154.028(m). SECTION 12.11.  The following provisions are repealed: (1)  Section 111.002(b), Family Code; (2)  Section 301.002, Family Code; (3)  Section 276.002(e), Finance Code; (4)  Section 23.303(e), Government Code, as added by S.B. 293, Acts of the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, and effective September 1, 2025; (5)  Section 74.1625(b), Government Code; and (6)  Section 410.305(b), Labor Code. SECTION 12.12.  On the effective date of this Act, a rule adopted by the Texas Supreme Court under Section 22.004, Government Code, as that section existed before the effective date of this Act, that conflicts with a provision of law is invalid and has no effect in any action commenced in any court in this state on or after the effective date of this Act. ARTICLE 13. JURORS SECTION 13.01.  Article 19A.105(b), Code of Criminal Procedure, as amended by H.B. 2637, Acts of the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, and effective September 1, 2025, is amended to read as follows: (b)  The following qualified persons may be exempted [claim an exemption] from grand jury service: (1)  a person who is 75 years of age or older; (2)  a person responsible for the care of a child who is younger than 18 years of age and who will be without adequate supervision if the person serves on the grand jury; (3)  a student of a public or private secondary school; (4)  a person enrolled in and in actual attendance at an institution of higher education; and (5)  any other person the court determines has a reasonable excuse from service. SECTION 13.02.  Section 62.107(c), Government Code, as amended by H.B. 2637, Acts of the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, and effective September 1, 2025, is amended to read as follows: (c)  A person who files a statement with a clerk of the court, as provided by Subsection (a), claiming an exemption because the person is 75 years of age or older, may also claim the permanent exemption on that ground authorized by Section 62.108 by including in the statement filed with the clerk a declaration that the person desires the permanent exemption. The clerk of the court with whom the declaration is filed shall notify the district clerk [secretary of state]. SECTION 13.03.  Section 62.108(e), Government Code, as amended by H.B. 2637, Acts of the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, and effective September 1, 2025, is amended to read as follows: (e)  A person who has claimed a permanent exemption from jury service because the person is 75 years of age or older may rescind the exemption at any time by filing a signed request for the rescission with the district clerk [voter registrar] of the county. Rescission of a permanent exemption does not affect the right of a person who is 75 years of age or older to claim permanent exemption at a later time. SECTION 13.04.  Sections 62.109(a) and (b), Government Code, as amended by H.B. 2637, Acts of the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, and effective September 1, 2025, are amended to read as follows: (a)  The judge of a district court or, if authorized by the local administrative district judge or the county jury plan, the district clerk may permanently or for a specified period exempt from service as a juror in all the county and district courts in the county a person with a physical or mental impairment or with an inability to comprehend or communicate in the English language that makes it impossible or very difficult for the person to serve on a jury. (b)  A person requesting an exemption under this section must submit to the court or the district clerk described by Subsection (a) an affidavit stating the person's name and address and the reason for and the duration of the requested exemption. A person requesting an exemption due to a physical or mental impairment must attach to the affidavit a statement from a physician. The affidavit and physician's statement may be submitted to the court at the time the person is summoned for jury service or at any other time. SECTION 13.05.  The changes in law made by this article apply only to a person who is summoned to appear for service on a grand jury or petit jury on or after the effective date of this Act. A person who is summoned to appear for service on a grand jury or petit jury before the effective date of this Act is governed by the law in effect on the date the person was summoned, and the former law is continued in effect for that purpose. ARTICLE 14. SPECIAL PROSECUTION UNIT SECTION 14.01.  Section 41.311, Government Code, as added by S.B. 1610, Acts of the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, and effective September 1, 2025, is amended to read as follows: Sec. 41.311.  PROSECUTION OF CERTAIN OFFENSES. An [A prosecuting] attorney serving on the unit has the same authority to represent this state in the prosecution of a criminal offense committed by a person civilly committed as a sexually violent predator under Chapter 841, Health and Safety Code, including an offense under Section 841.085, Health and Safety Code, as is conferred on a prosecuting [county attorney, district attorney, or criminal district] attorney of a court with jurisdiction of the offense. SECTION 14.02.  (a) Subchapter E, Chapter 41, Government Code, is amended by adding Sections 41.312, 41.313, and 41.314 to read as follows: Sec. 41.312.  IMMUNITY. (a) The following persons are immune from liability for good faith conduct under this chapter or Chapter 841, Health and Safety Code: (1)  a member of the board of directors; (2)  a member of the executive board; (3)  the chief of the unit; (4)  the counselor serving the unit; and (5)  any other employee or officer of the unit. (b)  A court shall immediately dismiss any action asserting a claim against a person described by Subsection (a) that arose from the person's good faith conduct. (c)  This section does not affect a defense, immunity, or jurisdictional bar available to a person described by Subsection (a). Sec. 41.313.  ATTORNEY GENERAL REPRESENTATION. (a) The attorney general shall defend any person described by Section 41.312(a) in an action if: (1)  the unit requests the attorney general defend the person; and (2)  the action arises from a service performed under this chapter or Chapter 841, Health and Safety Code. (b)  The unit or the person described by Section 41.312(a) is not responsible for and may not pay any costs associated with the assistance. Sec. 41.314.  RECOVERY OF COURT COSTS AND ATTORNEY'S FEES. (a) In an action against a person described by Section 41.312(a), the court shall award to the person court costs and attorney's fees incurred in the action if the person is found immune under that section and the person is not represented by the attorney general. (b)  In an action against a person described by Section 41.312(a) who is represented by the attorney general, the court shall award to the attorney general court costs and attorney's fees incurred in the action if the person is found immune under that section. (b)  Sections 41.312, 41.313, and 41.314, Government Code, as added by this article, apply only to an action filed on or after the effective date of this Act. An action filed before the effective date of this Act is governed by the law in effect immediately before the effective date of this Act, and that law is continued in effect for that purpose. ARTICLE 15. MISCELLANEOUS JUDICIAL, COURT, AND RECORD PROVISIONS SECTION 15.01.  The heading to Section 13.0021, Election Code, is amended to read as follows: Sec. 13.0021.  ADDITIONAL REGISTRATION INFORMATION FROM CERTAIN FEDERAL AND STATE JUDGES, FEDERAL OFFICIALS, CLERKS, GOVERNMENTAL EMPLOYEES, INCLUDING MUNICIPAL COURT PERSONNEL, AND FAMILY MEMBERS. SECTION 15.02.  Section 13.0021(b), Election Code, is amended to read as follows: (b)  The registrar of the county shall omit from the registration list the residence address for a [If the] registration applicant who is: (1)  a federal judge, including a federal bankruptcy judge; (2)  [,] a state judge; (3)  [,] a marshal of the United States Marshals Service; (4)  [,] a United States attorney; (5)  a current or former county clerk, district clerk, or county and district clerk, or a current or former employee of the office of a county clerk, district clerk, or county and district clerk or municipal court personnel; (6)  a current or former employee whose duties relate to court administration, including a court clerk, court coordinator, court administrator, juvenile case manager, law clerk, or staff attorney; (7)  a current or former employee of the Office of Court Administration of the Texas Judicial System and entities administratively attached to the office; (8)  a current or former employee or commissioner of the State Commission on Judicial Conduct; or (9) [, or] a family member of a person listed in Subdivisions (1)-(8) [state judge, a federal judge, including a federal bankruptcy judge, a marshal of the United States Marshals Service, or a United States attorney, the registrar of the county shall omit the applicant's residence address from the registration list]. SECTION 15.03.  Section 253.152(7), Election Code, is amended to read as follows: (7)  "Statewide judicial office" means the office of chief justice or justice, supreme court, or presiding judge or judge, court of criminal appeals, or chief justice or justice, Court of Appeals for the Fifteenth Court of Appeals District. SECTION 15.04.  Subchapter A, Chapter 58, Family Code, is amended by adding Section 58.010 to read as follows: Sec. 58.010.  CONFIDENTIALITY OF WARRANTS OF ARREST. Notwithstanding Article 15.26, Code of Criminal Procedure, an arrest warrant issued for a child and a complaint or affidavit on which an arrest warrant issued for a child is based are confidential and may be disclosed only to the following: (1)  the judge, probation officer, and professional staff or consultants of the juvenile court; (2)  a juvenile justice agency, as defined by Section 58.101; (3)  a criminal justice agency, as defined by Section 411.082, Government Code; (4)  an attorney representing the child's parent in a proceeding under this title; (5)  an attorney representing the child; (6)  a prosecuting attorney; or (7)  with permission from the juvenile court, another individual, agency, or institution with a legitimate interest in the information or court. SECTION 15.05.  (a) Section 81.113(a), Government Code, is amended to read as follows: (a)  Except as provided by Subsection (b), the state bar shall credit an attorney licensed in this state with meeting the minimum continuing legal education requirements of the state bar for a reporting year if during the reporting year the attorney is: (1)  employed full-time as an attorney by: (A) [(1)]  the senate; (B) [(2)]  the house of representatives; (C) [(3)]  a committee, division, department, or office of the senate or house; (D) [(4)]  the Texas Legislative Council; (E) [(5)]  the Legislative Budget Board; (F) [(6)]  the Legislative Reference Library; (G) [(7)]  the office of the state auditor; or (H) [(8)]  the Sunset Advisory Commission; or (2)  serving as a state official appointed by the governor and confirmed by the senate. (b)  Section 81.113, Government Code, as amended by this article, applies only to the minimum requirements for a continuing legal education compliance year that ends on or after the effective date of this Act. The minimum requirements for continuing legal education for a compliance year that ends before that date are covered by the law and rules in effect when the compliance year ended, and that law and those rules are continued in effect for that purpose. SECTION 15.06.  Section 92.001(1), Government Code, as added by H.B. 5081, Acts of the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, and effective September 1, 2025, is amended to read as follows: (1)  "At-risk individual" means: (A)  a judge, as defined by Section 33.001; (B)  a federal judge, as defined by Section 411.201, who resides in this state; (C)  a court clerk; or [and] (D) [(C)]  an employee of a state court, a court clerk, the office, or another agency in the judicial branch of state government. SECTION 15.07.  Section 552.117(a), Government Code, as amended by S.B. 370 and S.B. 1569, Acts of the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, and effective September 1, 2025, is reenacted and amended to read as follows: (a)  Information is excepted from the requirements of Section 552.021 if it is information that relates to the home address, home telephone number, emergency contact information, or social security number of the following person or that reveals whether the person has family members: (1)  a current or former official or employee of a governmental body, except as otherwise provided by Section 552.024; (2)  a current or honorably retired peace officer as defined by Article 2A.001, Code of Criminal Procedure, or a current or honorably retired security officer commissioned under Section 51.212, Education Code, regardless of whether the officer complies with Section 552.024 or 552.1175, as applicable; (3)  a current or former employee of the Texas Department of Criminal Justice or of the predecessor in function of the department or any division of the department, regardless of whether the current or former employee complies with Section 552.1175; (4)  a peace officer as defined by Article 2A.001, Code of Criminal Procedure, or other law, a reserve law enforcement officer, a commissioned deputy game warden, or a corrections officer in a municipal, county, or state penal institution in this state who was killed in the line of duty, regardless of whether the deceased complied with Section 552.024 or 552.1175; (5)  a commissioned security officer as defined by Section 1702.002, Occupations Code, regardless of whether the officer complies with Section 552.024 or 552.1175, as applicable; (6)  an officer or employee of a community supervision and corrections department established under Chapter 76 who performs a duty described by Section 76.004(b), regardless of whether the officer or employee complies with Section 552.024 or 552.1175; (7)  a current or former employee of the office of the attorney general and a family member of the current or former employee, regardless of whether the person complies with Section 552.024 or 552.1175; (8)  a current or former employee of the Texas Juvenile Justice Department or of the predecessors in function of the department, regardless of whether the current or former employee complies with Section 552.024 or 552.1175; (9)  a current or former juvenile probation or supervision officer certified by the Texas Juvenile Justice Department, or the predecessors in function of the department, under Title 12, Human Resources Code, regardless of whether the current or former officer complies with Section 552.024 or 552.1175; (10)  a current or former employee of a juvenile justice program or facility, as those terms are defined by Section 261.405, Family Code, regardless of whether the current or former employee complies with Section 552.024 or 552.1175; (11)  a current or former member of the United States Army, Navy, Air Force, Coast Guard, or Marine Corps, an auxiliary service of one of those branches of the armed forces, or the Texas military forces, as that term is defined by Section 437.001; (12)  a current or former district attorney, criminal district attorney, or county or municipal attorney whose jurisdiction includes any criminal law or child protective services matters, regardless of whether the current or former attorney complies with Section 552.024 or 552.1175; (13)  a current or former employee of a district attorney, criminal district attorney, or county or municipal attorney whose jurisdiction includes any criminal law or child protective services matters, regardless of whether the current or former employee complies with Section 552.024 or 552.1175; (14)  a current or former employee of the Texas Civil Commitment Office or of the predecessor in function of the office or a division of the office, regardless of whether the current or former employee complies with Section 552.024 or 552.1175; (15)  a current or former federal judge or state judge, as those terms are defined by Section 1.005, Election Code, a federal bankruptcy judge, a marshal of the United States Marshals Service, a United States attorney, or a family member of a current or former federal judge, including a federal bankruptcy judge, a marshal of the United States Marshals Service, a United States attorney, or a state judge; (16)  a current or former child protective services caseworker, adult protective services caseworker, or investigator for the Department of Family and Protective Services, regardless of whether the caseworker or investigator complies with Section 552.024 or 552.1175, or a current or former employee of a department contractor performing child protective services caseworker, adult protective services caseworker, or investigator functions for the contractor on behalf of the department; (17)  an elected public officer, regardless of whether the officer complies with Section 552.024 or 552.1175; (18)  a current or former United States attorney, assistant United States attorney, federal public defender, deputy federal public defender, or assistant federal public defender and the spouse or child of the current or former attorney or public defender, regardless of whether the person complies with Section 552.024 or 552.1175; [or] (19)  a firefighter or volunteer firefighter or emergency medical services personnel as defined by Section 773.003, Health and Safety Code, regardless of whether the firefighter or volunteer firefighter or emergency medical services personnel comply with Section 552.024 or 552.1175, as applicable; (20)  a current or former employee of a public defender's office as defined by Article 26.044(a), Code of Criminal Procedure, regardless of whether the current or former employee complies with Section 552.024 or 552.1175; (21) [(20)]  a member of the governing board of an institution of higher education or a private or independent institution of higher education, as those terms are defined by Section 61.003, Education Code; (22) [(21)]  the chancellor or other chief executive officer of a university system, as defined by Section 61.003, Education Code; [or] (23) [(22)]  the president or other chief executive officer of an institution of higher education or a private or independent institution of higher education, as those terms are defined by Section 61.003, Education Code; (24)  a current or former county clerk, district clerk, or county and district clerk, or a current or former employee of the office of a county clerk, district clerk, or county and district clerk, regardless of whether the current or former clerk or employee complies with Section 552.024 or 552.1175; (25)  a current or former employee whose duties relate to court administration, including a court clerk, court coordinator, court administrator, juvenile case manager, law clerk, or staff attorney, regardless of whether the employee complies with Section 552.024 or 552.1175; (26)  a current or former employee of the Office of Court Administration of the Texas Judicial System and entities administratively attached to the office, regardless of whether the employee complies with Section 552.024 or 552.1175; or (27)  a current or former employee or commissioner of the State Commission on Judicial Conduct, regardless of whether the employee or commissioner complies with Section 552.024 or 552.1175. SECTION 15.08.  Section 552.117, Government Code, is amended by amending Subsection (b) and adding Subsection (b-1) to read as follows: (b)  Except as provided by Subsection (b-1), all [All] documents filed with a county clerk and all documents filed with a district clerk are exempt from this section. (b-1)  A county clerk or district clerk on request of a person to whom this section applies shall redact information described by Subsection (a) that relates to the person posted on an Internet website by: (1)  the clerk; or (2)  an entity with which the county contracts for the provision or maintenance of the Internet website. SECTION 15.09.  Section 552.1175(a), Government Code, as amended by S.B. 370, S.B. 1540, and S.B. 1569, Acts of the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, and effective September 1, 2025, is reenacted and amended to read as follows: (a)  This section applies only to: (1)  current or honorably retired peace officers as defined by Article 2A.001, Code of Criminal Procedure, or special investigators as described by Article 2A.002, Code of Criminal Procedure; (2)  current or honorably retired county jailers as defined by Section 1701.001, Occupations Code; (3)  current or former employees of the Texas Department of Criminal Justice or of the predecessor in function of the department or any division of the department; (4)  commissioned security officers as defined by Section 1702.002, Occupations Code; (5)  a current or former district attorney, criminal district attorney, or county or municipal attorney whose jurisdiction includes any criminal law or child protective services matters; (5-a)  a current or former employee of a district attorney, criminal district attorney, or county or municipal attorney whose jurisdiction includes any criminal law or child protective services matters; (6)  officers and employees of a community supervision and corrections department established under Chapter 76 who perform a duty described by Section 76.004(b); (7)  criminal investigators of the United States as described by Article 2A.002(a), Code of Criminal Procedure; (8)  current or honorably retired police officers and inspectors of the United States Federal Protective Service; (9)  current or former employees of the office of the attorney general and a family member of the current or former employee; (10)  current or former juvenile probation and detention officers certified by the Texas Juvenile Justice Department, or the predecessors in function of the department, under Title 12, Human Resources Code; (11)  current or former employees of a juvenile justice program or facility, as those terms are defined by Section 261.405, Family Code; (12)  current or former employees of the Texas Juvenile Justice Department or the predecessors in function of the department; (13)  federal judges and state judges as defined by Section 1.005, Election Code; (14)  current or former employees of the Texas Civil Commitment Office or of the predecessor in function of the office or a division of the office; (15)  a current or former member of the United States Army, Navy, Air Force, Coast Guard, or Marine Corps, an auxiliary service of one of those branches of the armed forces, or the Texas military forces, as that term is defined by Section 437.001; (16)  a current or former child protective services caseworker, adult protective services caseworker, or investigator for the Department of Family and Protective Services or a current or former employee of a department contractor performing child protective services caseworker, adult protective services caseworker, or investigator functions for the contractor on behalf of the department; (17)  an elected public officer; (18)  a firefighter or volunteer firefighter or emergency medical services personnel as defined by Section 773.003, Health and Safety Code; (19)  a current or former United States attorney, assistant United States attorney, federal public defender, deputy federal public defender, or assistant federal public defender; [or] (20)  a current or former employee of a public defender's office as defined by Article 26.044(a), Code of Criminal Procedure; (21) [(20)]  a current or former election official, as defined by Section 1.005, Election Code, or employee, volunteer, or designee of an election official, or an employee of the secretary of state's office who performs duties relating to elections; (22) [(20)]  a member of the governing board of an institution of higher education or a private or independent institution of higher education, as those terms are defined by Section 61.003, Education Code; (23) [(21)]  the chancellor or other chief executive officer of a university system, as defined by Section 61.003, Education Code; [and] (24) [(22)]  the president or other chief executive officer of an institution of higher education or a private or independent institution of higher education, as those terms are defined by Section 61.003, Education Code; (25)  a current or former county clerk, district clerk, or county and district clerk, or a current or former employee of the office of a county clerk, district clerk, or county and district clerk; (26)  a current or former employee whose duties relate to court administration, including a court clerk, court coordinator, court administrator, juvenile case manager, law clerk, or staff attorney; (27)  a current or former employee of the Office of Court Administration of the Texas Judicial System and entities administratively attached to the office; and (28)  a current or former employee or commissioner of the State Commission on Judicial Conduct. SECTION 15.10.  Section 552.1175, Government Code, is amended by amending Subsection (e) and adding Subsection (e-1) to read as follows: (e)  Except as provided by Subsection (e-1), all [All] documents filed with a county clerk and all documents filed with a district clerk are exempt from this section. (e-1)  A county clerk or district clerk on request of a person to whom this section applies shall redact information described by Subsection (b) that relates to the person from any document the clerk posts on an Internet website. SECTION 15.11.  Section 615.003(a), Local Government Code, is amended to read as follows: (a)  A county [with a population of 150,000 or more] may construct, enlarge, equip, and operate a parking lot or parking garage adjacent to or near the county courthouse. SECTION 15.12.  Section 42.07(b), Penal Code, is amended by amending Subdivision (1) and adding Subdivision (1-a) to read as follows: (1)  "Court employee" means an employee whose duties relate to court administration, including a court clerk, court coordinator, court administrator, juvenile case manager, law clerk, or staff attorney.  The term does not include a judge. (1-a)  "Electronic communication" means a transfer of signs, signals, writing, images, sounds, data, or intelligence of any nature transmitted in whole or in part by a wire, radio, electromagnetic, photoelectronic, or photo-optical system.  The term includes: (A)  a communication initiated through the use of electronic mail, instant message, network call, a cellular or other type of telephone, a computer, a camera, text message, a social media platform or application, an Internet website, any other Internet-based communication tool, or facsimile machine; and (B)  a communication made to a pager. SECTION 15.13.  Section 42.07(c), Penal Code, as amended by S.B. 482, Acts of the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, and effective September 1, 2025, is amended to read as follows: (c)  An offense under this section is a Class B misdemeanor, except that the offense is: (1)  a Class A misdemeanor if: (A) [(1)]  the actor has previously been convicted under this section; (B) [(2)]  the offense was committed under Subsection (a)(7) or (8) and: (i) [(A)]  the offense was committed against a child under 18 years of age with the intent that the child: (a) [(i)]  commit suicide; or (b) [(ii)]  engage in conduct causing serious bodily injury to the child; or (ii) [(B)]  the actor has previously violated a temporary restraining order or injunction issued under Chapter 129A, Civil Practice and Remedies Code; [or] (C) [(3)]  the offense was committed against a person the actor knows or reasonably should know is an employee or agent of a utility while the person is performing a duty within the scope of that employment or agency; or (D)  the offense was committed against a person the actor knows is a court employee; (2)  a state jail felony if the offense was committed against a person the actor knows is: (A)  a court employee and the actor has previously been convicted under this section; or (B)  a judge; and (3)  a felony of the third degree if the offense was committed against a person the actor knows is a judge and the actor has previously been convicted under this section. SECTION 15.14.  Section 25.025(a), Tax Code, as amended by H.B. 1620, S.B. 370, and S.B. 1569, Acts of the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, and effective September 1, 2025, is reenacted and amended to read as follows: (a)  This section applies only to: (1)  a current or former peace officer as defined by Article 2A.001, Code of Criminal Procedure, and the spouse or surviving spouse of the peace officer; (2)  the adult child of a current peace officer as defined by Article 2A.001, Code of Criminal Procedure; (3)  a current or honorably retired county jailer as defined by Section 1701.001, Occupations Code; (4)  an employee of the Texas Department of Criminal Justice; (5)  a commissioned security officer as defined by Section 1702.002, Occupations Code; (6)  an individual who shows that the individual, the individual's child, or another person in the individual's household is a victim of family violence as defined by Section 71.004, Family Code, by providing: (A)  a copy of a protective order issued under Chapter 85, Family Code, or a magistrate's order for emergency protection issued under Article 17.292, Code of Criminal Procedure; or (B)  other independent documentary evidence necessary to show that the individual, the individual's child, or another person in the individual's household is a victim of family violence; (7)  an individual who shows that the individual, the individual's child, or another person in the individual's household is a victim of sexual assault or abuse, stalking, or trafficking of persons by providing: (A)  a copy of a protective order issued under Subchapter A or B, Chapter 7B, Code of Criminal Procedure, or a magistrate's order for emergency protection issued under Article 17.292, Code of Criminal Procedure; or (B)  other independent documentary evidence necessary to show that the individual, the individual's child, or another person in the individual's household is a victim of sexual assault or abuse, stalking, or trafficking of persons; (8)  a participant in the address confidentiality program administered by the attorney general under Subchapter B, Chapter 58, Code of Criminal Procedure, who provides proof of certification under Article 58.059, Code of Criminal Procedure; (9)  a federal judge, a federal bankruptcy judge, a marshal of the United States Marshals Service, a state judge, or a family member of a federal judge, a federal bankruptcy judge, a marshal of the United States Marshals Service, or a state judge; (10)  a current or former district attorney, criminal district attorney, or county or municipal attorney whose jurisdiction includes any criminal law or child protective services matters; (11)  a current or former employee of a district attorney, criminal district attorney, or county or municipal attorney whose jurisdiction includes any criminal law or child protective services matters; (12)  an officer or employee of a community supervision and corrections department established under Chapter 76, Government Code, who performs a duty described by Section 76.004(b) of that code; (13)  a criminal investigator of the United States as described by Article 2A.002(a), Code of Criminal Procedure; (14)  a current or honorably retired police officer or inspector of the United States Federal Protective Service; (15)  a current or former United States attorney, assistant United States attorney, federal public defender, deputy federal public defender, or assistant federal public defender and the spouse and child of the attorney or public defender; (16)  a current or former employee of the office of the attorney general and a family member of the current or former employee; (17)  a medical examiner or person who performs forensic analysis or testing who is employed by this state or one or more political subdivisions of this state; (18)  a current or former member of the United States armed forces who has served in an area that the president of the United States by executive order designates for purposes of 26 U.S.C. Section 112 as an area in which armed forces of the United States are or have engaged in combat; (19)  a current or former employee of the Texas Juvenile Justice Department or of the predecessors in function of the department; (20)  a current or former juvenile probation or supervision officer certified by the Texas Juvenile Justice Department, or the predecessors in function of the department, under Title 12, Human Resources Code; (21)  a current or former employee of a juvenile justice program or facility, as those terms are defined by Section 261.405, Family Code; (22)  a current or former employee of the Texas Civil Commitment Office or the predecessor in function of the office or a division of the office; (23)  a current or former employee of a federal judge or state judge; (24)  a current or former child protective services caseworker, adult protective services caseworker, or investigator for the Department of Family and Protective Services or a current or former employee of a department contractor performing child protective services caseworker, adult protective services caseworker, or investigator functions for the contractor on behalf of the department; (25)  an elected public officer; (26)  a firefighter or volunteer firefighter or emergency medical services personnel as defined by Section 773.003, Health and Safety Code; (27)  a customs and border protection officer or border patrol agent of United States Customs and Border Protection or the spouse, surviving spouse, or adult child of a customs and border protection officer or border patrol agent; (28)  a current or former employee or contract staff member of a university health care provider at a corrections facility operated by the Texas Department of Criminal Justice or the Texas Juvenile Justice Department; (29)  a current or former attorney for the Department of Family and Protective Services; (30)  a member of the governing board of an institution of higher education or a private or independent institution of higher education, as those terms are defined by Section 61.003, Education Code; (31)  the chancellor or other chief executive officer of a university system, as defined by Section 61.003, Education Code; [and] (32)  the president or other chief executive officer of an institution of higher education or a private or independent institution of higher education, as those terms are defined by Section 61.003, Education Code; (33) [(30)]  a current or former employee of a public defender's office as defined by Article 26.044(a), Code of Criminal Procedure; (34)  a current or former county clerk, district clerk, or county and district clerk, or a current or former employee of the office of a county clerk, district clerk, or county and district clerk; (35)  a current or former employee whose duties relate to court administration, including a court clerk, court coordinator, court administrator, juvenile case manager, law clerk, or staff attorney; (36)  a current or former employee of the Office of Court Administration of the Texas Judicial System and entities administratively attached to the office; and (37)  a current or former employee or commissioner of the State Commission on Judicial Conduct. SECTION 15.15.  Section 521.121, Transportation Code, is amended by amending Subsections (a) and (c) and adding Subsection (c-1) to read as follows: (a)  The driver's license must include: (1)  a distinguishing number assigned by the department to the license holder; (2)  a photograph of the entire face of the holder; (3)  the full name and date of birth of the holder; (4)  a brief description of the holder; and (5)  the license holder's residence address or, for a license holder using the procedure under Subsection (c): (A)  [,] the street address of the courthouse in which the license holder or license holder's spouse or parent: (i)  serves as a federal judge, including a federal bankruptcy judge, a marshal of the United States Marshals Service, a United States attorney, or a state judge; or (ii)  performs duties related to court administration, including a court clerk, court coordinator, court administrator, juvenile case manager, law clerk, or staff attorney; or (B)  the office address of the office in which the license holder or the license holder's spouse or parent performs duties as an employee of the office of a county clerk, district clerk, or county and district clerk, or of the Office of Court Administration of the Texas Judicial System and entities administratively attached to the office, or as an employee or commissioner of the State Commission on Judicial Conduct. (c)  The department shall establish a procedure, on a license holder's qualification for or appointment to office as a federal or state judge as defined by Section 1.005, Election Code, or as a county clerk, district clerk, or county and district clerk, or as a federal bankruptcy judge, a marshal of the United States Marshals Service, [or] a United States attorney, or for a license holder whose duties relate to court administration, including a court clerk, court coordinator, court administrator, juvenile case manager, law clerk, or staff attorney, or as an employee of the office of a county clerk, district clerk, or county and district clerk, or of the Office of Court Administration of the Texas Judicial System and entities administratively attached to the office, or as an employee or commissioner of the State Commission on Judicial Conduct, to omit the residence address of the judge, [or] official, employee, or commissioner and any family member of the judge, [or] official, employee, or commissioner on the license holder's license and to print [include], in lieu of that address, the street address of the courthouse or office building in which the license holder or license holder's spouse or parent serves as a federal or state judge, [or] official, employee, or commissioner. (c-1)  The residence address of a license holder whose residence address is omitted using the procedure under Subsection (c) is confidential and is available only for the official use of the department or a law enforcement agency. SECTION 15.16.  Section 42.07, Penal Code, as amended by this article, applies only to an offense committed on or after the effective date of this Act. An offense committed before that date is governed by the law in effect on the date the offense was committed, and the former law is continued in effect for that purpose. For purposes of this section, an offense was committed before the effective date of this Act if any element of the offense occurred before that date. SECTION 15.17.  Not later than November 1, 2026, the Department of Public Safety shall: (1)  review the department's processes for implementation of and compliance with Section 521.121, Transportation Code, as amended by this article; and (2)  submit to the governor, the lieutenant governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, each member of the legislature, and the Texas Judicial Council a written report containing the results of the review, a description of the methods used to prepare the review, and any recommendations for legislative or other action. ARTICLE 16. EFFECTIVE DATE SECTION 16.01.  Except as otherwise provided by a provision of this Act, this Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session. ______________________________ ______________________________ President of the Senate Speaker of the House I certify that H.B. No. 16 was passed by the House on August 25, 2025, by the following vote:  Yeas 130, Nays 1, 1 present, not voting. ______________________________ Chief Clerk of the House I certify that H.B. No. 16 was passed by the Senate on August 26, 2025, by the following vote:  Yeas 27, Nays 0. ______________________________ Secretary of the Senate APPROVED:  _____________________ Date _____________________ Governor